is there a release party channel around ?
! ldap ssh
? party channel ? what is it? :D
!party
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
!party
frugi: #ubuntu-release=party
escott: It's the new one.  The old one is still on the disk, but commented out in /etc/fstab, and isn't listed in swapon -s anymore.
I tried booking this band, but for some absolutely bonkers reason, they're not within my budget range: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oHg5SJYRHA0
how many days a ubuntu system booting from a usb pen drive last considering such a drive has a fixed number of write cycles.
Zahrada: Please don't post irrelevant links in here
prakas.. quite some time still, i'd imagine
Hello
again
I mispasted IdleOne.
Zahrada: odd you wqould mispaste a rickroll
would*
Zahrada: anyway please keep comments Ubuntu support related.
lease install the package with full kernel sources for your distribution - that is what it says when i try to run the installer for my audio driver
E: Unable to locate package kernel-headers-2.6.35-28-generic-pae
how do i fix this?
timdot: i am not writing to any directory. just using the machine as a nat gateway
It's true though. I'm part of a ngo that's organising a music festival in my local town...
for unicef
prakas: i'd imagine a good few years - i may be wrong though and it's impossible to predict exactly
hmm
Sorry to be a bother but I'm having issues connecting to wifi on ubuntu 10 something with my netgear pci 802.11g wifi card. It shows a wifi symbol up near the clock in the corner with a red ! and has grayed out wired connection thing in the list and doesn't acknowledge wifi there. I can set wifi settings but at no point does it give me the option to connect.
kyle____: install headers from synaptic	
cf
it says they are installed
is there a way to clone this usb pen drive incase it fails?so that i can use the other pen drive to boot
kyle____: this specific package kernel-headers-2.6.35-28-generic-pae
harrihu: i was having similar problems. i updated using the update manager... and now it works fine.
question: shouldn't the command "lsmod" and "modprobe -l" give the same output for loaded modules?
11.4 come out on 28 apr 2011 right at what time midnight edt ???
prakas: yeah, you can use the 'dd' command for that
yes
prakas: `man dd` might help you.
jpk, was thinking that maybe resume was trying to load a stale image from the old swap partition
hmmm ty
pindropper it's not hooked up to the internet
pooltable: Natty is not yet released and there is no predetermined time on the 28th when it will be. Await the release in #ubuntu-release-party or for more questions join #ubuntu+1
kyle____: sory then I can help you
*can not
but thanks for the suggestion pin
pici just wonder fit it had a set time thanks
it
I'm running Ubuntu 10.04 and I am trying to do an nfs mount from  a NAS that cannot do nfs4.  My mount fails, and when I put -vvvvv as a flag, I see that the out put says, "mount.nfs: mount(2): Connection refused
harrihu: theres your problem then. if the internets not on but your wifi is... strange as it is, at least in my experience, ubuntu refuses to connect
mount.nfs: trying text-based options 'vers=4,addr=192.168.10.41,clientaddr=192.168.10.80'" before it fails.   How do I get it NOT to use nfs4??
guys, I couldn't find the answer on ubuntu formus, and I am not trolling. Do you think ok-smelling sandwitches are still ok to eat after staying for a day in room temperature (version - smoked ham, ubuntu 10.10). (I just read the IRC guidelines, they didn't seem to forbid this)
no no it's not connecting to the router not just the internet
I'm on a windows machine now
how long will 10.10 wil have support ???/
gedas: We don't troubleshoot sandwiches. :(
ahh, sorry about that, i'll have to find a more suitable room to ask:(
gedas: eat the before they eat you
harrihu: thats what i said, if the routers not connected to the internet, ubuntu sometimes wont connect to your wifi either.
Does anyone know when 11.4 goes live? It's the 28th in London.
The router is connected to the internet thats how I'm on
pooltable: 18 months
it 28th in Greece too :P
!party | RandomAndGone
RandomAndGone: Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
harrihu: you might also want to try and do "edit connections" and add one in manually and try.
escott: Ah, I see.  I figure it's something like that.  I just haven't yet been able to find where/how the thing that resumes finds the stuff in swap to verify that it's looking in the right place.
harrihu: is your wireless network a hidden one by any chance? try create new wireless, or hidden wireless connection and see if that helps
There is nothing wrong with the wifi router it's all with the linux machine
harrihu: read my previous two suggestions
if there was something wrong with the router I wouldn't be able to connect on this other pc
thanks for the suggestions pindropper
looking into it
i want to change the close botton of chrome to the right
for help
i am trying to figure out a way to execute a command on a double key press. Is this at all possible through bash? The keyboard shortcut mappings don't provide a way to capture double key presses.
I'm running Ubuntu 10.04 and I am trying to do an nfs mount from a NAS that cannot do nfs4. My mount fails, and when I put -vvvvv as a flag, I see that the out put says, "mount.nfs: mount(2): Connection refused	mount.nfs: trying text-based options 'vers=4,addr=192.168.10.41,clientaddr=192.168.10.80'" before it fails. How do I get it NOT to use nfs4??
wireless network is not hidden and I did try adding one manually
harrihu: and...?
it never even gives me the button "connect"
it just gives me an add button and ok
and a delete etc
I never see the network listed and it's not hidden
will dd if=/dev/sda of=/dev/sdb copy the entire file systems in sda to sdb with boot sectors preserved?
I don't think the wifi card works with the OS
harrihu: does it even attempt to connect? you know once you've added the network... does it try to connect?
prakas: think so
nope
considering sda and sdb are usb removable disks (pen drives)
harrihu: did it ever work?
nope
harrihu: what device is it, do you know?
harrihu: What does the output look like with "iwconfig wlan0"?
harrihu: ah . in that case there is a very good chance you need proprietary drivers. which you wont know until you connect. you might want to try connecting through a lan cable and get it to work.
jpk, but from what you said it appears that is not happening
whats iwconfig wlan0?
iwconfig is like ifconfig but for wireless I believe
harrihu: it is a comman line.
iwconfig wlan0 will tell you the status of wlan0
ok
well it's almost impossible to get this machine hooked up wired
I could try but if theres any other way
what problem you have with wired?
the router is upstairs very far away from the box with no plugs and this box is built into a home theater system
where is a place to buy ubuntu 11.4 ???
ah ok
harrihu: i know.. its a bit of a fix if you have problems with wired. but really, ubuntu will notify you of possible problems or updates once you connect. maybe a phone/usb/3g/edge sharing , even for 10 mins might help.
harrihu: If you getnoting useful from iwconfig, do a google with "{name of wifi card} +ubuntu +driver +download"
pooltable, check ubuntu's website, they have resellers
pooltable: there is no need to buy it, just download it when it is released
hmm you know what I'll give it a try
harrihu: getnoting==get nothing
when you type iwconfig wlan0 what do you get?
I have a usb wifi stick and if that fails I'll take the time to get the computer up there
pooltable: https://shop.canonical.com/
running in vmware? ?
one moment robert05ad I'll try that.
I'm running Ubuntu 10.04 and I am trying to do an nfs mount from a NAS that cannot do nfs4. My mount fails, and when I put -vvvvv as a flag, I see that the out put says, "mount.nfs: mount(2): Connection refused	mount.nfs: trying text-based options 'vers=4,addr=192.168.10.41,clientaddr=192.168.10.80'" before it fails. How do I get it NOT to use nfs4??
zvacet i just see 10.10 i want 11.4
I;ve heard that 10* is a little buggy in nfs.  Does anyone concur?
oh oh Lin, I know that answer... but not off the top of my head lol it's a mount option but i forget
pooltable: 11.04 isn't released yet as far as I know
I just removed my ubuntu from my VM machine so I cant help to remember it lol
waiting on 11.04
cybrhuman: correct
none are released yet
cybrhuman i see
robert05ad: I have "nfs" not "nfs4" as my mount type.
Hey all. I'm out in New Zealand and it's the 28th, how do I get from Mav to Natty?
can someone help me real quick. I think i am doing something wrong with setting up my live USB
right lin
dibs: It's not released yet.
top_ramen: Whatcha doing?
shoot regretting removing it now..
top_ramen: just put a regular cd and install to the usb disk
try man mount
pooltable: 11.04 will be out today so you will have chance to buy it
rww: But it's supposed to be out today yeah?
yeah Dibs
few hours yet
dibs: It's due out some time in the period that it's April 28th somewhere in the world.
I but 10.10 on a usb and use the usb install exe thats on the ubuntu.com/download page to set the usb up
dibs: depends on time zone  :)
here another location for al http://distrowatch.com/
all
sweet, anyone know where a countdown is
i use 7.04 fiesty fawn lol
when 10 came out we were all sitting in here until like 2 am lol, (central time)
but my computer is not recongizing it as a bootable usb
dibs: There is no set time, hence no countdown.
dammit, I was hoping to get an hour or two down time while I upgrade. Gah, will have to get back to work
escott: I guess what I mean is some resume code goes, "let's see if there's an image in the old swap partition... oh, wait, it's not there anymore.  Oh well, just do a normal boot."  Then later on when something looks at the new swap partition, it sees an image in there and goes, "What's this crap?  We're doing a normal boot."  Then clears it out.  Or something.  My biggest enemy, here, is I don't know how resume works yet. :-P
lol dibs
Is upgrding using the update-manager -d risky? like it will use the same repo yeah?
top_ramen: I think that you need to explicitly copy the 0th sector from the cd (cdimage) to the usb.
what time was 10.10 out ?
Lin, ummm what?
jpk, did you leave the old swap partition unchanged, you could write a new filesystem on top of it
3 in the morning  Next stupid question.
i still prefer 7.04 lol
uncmar, whats your name?
Anyone got Mark's number, let's take this to the top
it is more lightweight
10.10 takes a lot of time to load
hey Lin, did you try mount -t nfs option?
!party
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
10.10 = 10 of 2010 or October.
instead of -t nfs4
top_ramen: I think that you need to do "dd if={cd|cdimage} of={usb location} count=1
top_ramen: my name is annoyed beyond belief, so.. Um.  wann come stay in my area.  we got lots of tornadoes to go, round and round fer ya.
no what time of the day ?
join #python
whoops
i know 11.4= 2011 apr
uncmar: 10.10= october 2010
uncmar, I am in kansas... im good lol
Hia
Banshee media player won't play files
robert05ad: Yes, I did...it still tries to force vers=4 onto the commandline.
Banshee media player won't play files, remains idle, why ?
uncmar: sorry it is 2010 october
Banshee media player won't play files, remains idle, why ?
escott: Yeah, besides unmounting/swapoff'ing it, I left it alone.
6.06 should have come out on 6.6.6  It would have been a triplet but  more impressive, 6-6 1947? was Doomsday.
Or rather, D-Day.
Alterno: does any sound program work, or just banshee is busted?
Good evening everyone :)
hey is there a command to flush the cache
anyhow. pooltable I don't know what time of day any of the releases where. sorry.
just banshee it seems, i have to re import files to ake it work
uncmar: little bit of topic don´t you think
hiexpo: which cashe?
Lin, can you check your queries
just banshee it seems, i have to re import files to make it work
jpk, i don't buy the proposed source of the error you suggested, but if you want to be sure i would make that and ext4 partition
hiexpo: cache of what?
shows idle stats atm
hi all
top_ramen: Queries??
ActionParsnip, my ram
zvacet: nope, My 6.06 is currently broken, so right on the topic of why I'm here.
Hello Devil999
Lin, Yeah i sent you a query
hiexpo: do you mean swap space? If you flush the ram then the system will cease to be
how's it going? any news for 11.04?
uncmar: why do you use unsupported version
{blush} not knowing what it was, I closed the tab.
Lin, sent again ^^
uncmar: do you use server
because it was a running server.  that I didn't want to take time to upgrade.
Why is it when I listen the channels on XChat, I can't join anything? x.x
ActionParsnip, well after like today i had 146.00 gig in ram being used and only have 2 gig ram
spending a DAY to upgrade/revive a system from an upgrade attempt stinks.
any idea?
hiexpo: can you give the output of:   free -m
uncmar: is there any reason not to upgrade now
zvacet: so, I just answered both questions with one answer.
uncmar: ok
nope, Right out of ubuntu. though I must admint Ubuntu wasn't the reason for the failure.  *I AM*
*admit
escott: Ah, I see.  I'll try that, then.
ActionParsnip, i rebooted so not anymore but here it is  http://pastebin.com/hStiPUnS
hiexpo: when it's high, rerun it
hi all...looking for a little hand holding using webmin to configure proftpd...all i want to do is allow a single user (not myself, or anonymous access to my /home/user/Pictures directory?
I'd switch to fedora or.. well, I could eventually think of another, but I'm not ready to do a near Complete relearn of tools.
hiexpo: you are only using 550Mb. You have 1884Mb available and have 1360Mb free
ActionParsnip, yes right now but as i do stuff it will rise maybe takes a day or two
Hola :)
Now I remember why I'm here.
hiexpo: if its only cache then its fine, unused ram is wasted ram
when building from source, and doing autogen.sh is there a way to force, and make it finish, regardless of missing dependancies?
hiexpo: just watch the right hand value on the "-/+ buffers/cache" line
of course I could attempt to poke around the net.  Need to know system requirements of 8.04 Live CD.  I won't dare attempt 9.04 or 10.04
hiexpo: that is the actual free ram
I'm limited to 256Mb of ram.
hhhhhhh
need help with my display only has one resolution
what time is the launch of Ubuntu 11.04 ?
fieris: Natty is not yet released and there is no predetermined time on the 28th when it will be. Await the release in #ubuntu-release-party or for more questions join #ubuntu+1
okey thank.!
Hmm, it is time for 11.04.  Time flies.  I hadn't give it any thought.
my video is intel 845ge built on board video
Wait.. I haven't been in the loop for a while. 11.04 is launching soon? :o
hello, can i update from 10.10 to 11.04 now, or do i have to wait until tomorrow?
My upgrade attempt from 8.04 to 10.04 exploded, so I moved over to debian.  Closer to the trunk of the tree for stability.  Low and behold I have another dead ubuntu.
KidDeath, it is supposed to launch tomorrow sime thme
time*
linuxman410: run:  sudo lshw -C display     websearch for the product line to find guides. You may need an xorg.conf to make it work ok
Fascinating, looks like I have something new to play around with. :)
:D
can someome tell me how to fix my display
the alternates are installs only?
drivers
ok
linuxman410: in the old days we would just smack the TV harder to fix the display. Or call the TV repair man.
lol @ uncmar
uncmar, or go to the hardware store and use their tube tester, which were geared to finding slightly poor tubes so as  to sell more  tubes.
hola amigos
I'm running Ubuntu 10.04 and I am trying to do an nfs mount from a NAS that cannot do nfs4. My mount fails, and when I put -vvvvv as a flag, I see that the out put says, "mount.nfs: mount(2): Connection refused	mount.nfs: trying text-based options 'vers=4,addr=192.168.10.41,clientaddr=192.168.10.80'" before it fails. How do I get it NOT to use nfs4??
... and yes, I use -t nfs, NOT -t nfs4.
a question : "sudo apt-get dist-upgrade" doesnt work anymore???
amalgama: It works fine here.
amalgama: say what?..
any idea how long itll take before 11.04 is released?
!dist-upgrade | make sure you understand what its supposed to do though amalgama
make sure you understand what its supposed to do though amalgama: A dist-upgrade will install new dependencies for packages already installed and may remove packages if they are no longer needed. Please see !upgrade for the proper way to upgrade to a new version of Ubuntu.
!11.04
Natty Narwhal is the codename for Ubuntu 11.04, due April 28 2011. Help and support (only) in #ubuntu+1. Natty is beta and is not currently intended for production systems.
Vorenii: ^
Vorenii: Natty is not yet released and there is no predetermined time on the 28th when it will be. Await the release in #ubuntu-release-party or for more questions join #ubuntu+1
someone use lighttpd ?
hmmm... i was using dist-upgrade in order to go from one version to another
!upgrade
For upgrading, see the instructions at https://help.ubuntu.com/community/UpgradeNotes - see also http://www.ubuntu.com/desktop/get-ubuntu/upgrade
include "/home/lighttpd/vhosts/*/conf/vhost.conf" it's wrong
how can i correct it?
i have to change *
with * I mean all the directories inside there
hey, can someone recommend me a good PPA for GIMP 2.7.2?
Hi
is there a way to know when Ubuntu Server 10.04 LTS has been installed ?
on a specific server
when or if?
not sure what  you're asking
Alastaur: for desktop we have installer.log
In ubuntu, is there any way to sync all files between two folders? As in, I want them to be exactly the same, and they mostly already are. Rather than recopying everything, is there a tool to just recopy whats changed?
Can someone recommend a good dock (docky,awn,cario-dock,etc)?
Ziber: rsync can do that
NxtGenCowboy, i loke cario-dock
like*
Ampelbein: hm, thanks
mknarr, I havent tried that one yet.. the last 2 I tried.. really had a good chunk of bugs when compiz was running
Ziber, i use Unison. I think it's simpler, and has GUI. Your choice!
hello
oi
when will 11.04 be available for download?
tomorrow some time
Devil999: rsync works, thanks tho
i mean the 28th*
mknarr, what's the date there?
meisth0th, 27 8pm
Thu Apr 28 03:01:20 EEST 2011
hello. i am using some kind of irc client.
sdegutis, is that a question?
not really, no.
im writing it, too.
and im using it.
just thought id let you know.
ok, then...
where is the main premissions file located on ubuntu 10.04
sdegutis: You sure are.
thanks.
i try.
its not very good though.
mknarr: can you elaborate? what are you looking for?
but thats ok because its mine.
sdegutis: Looks like it's working like a charm.
Any1 know when 11.04 is coming live?
Im looking for the file that holds all of the premissions  and or user group info
well, you arent on this side of it.
on this side its pretty crappy.
hi can someone tell me how i can get synaptic manager to start
mknarr: Well, there is /etc/groups
its ui is largely html+css+jquery, even though its a desktop app.
sdegutis, that's really something. gratz.
well, not really.
usr13,  says it dosnt exsist
it doesnt work on ubuntu though.
Ph0n7r1c: Alt-F2 synaptic
you guys just talk a lot, which helps me look at my client :)
especially the scrolling and stuff
mknarr: Well, there is /etc/group
mknarr: Sorry, typo
Does Gwibber crap out for anyone after a few weeks?
sdegutis, sure thing... just stick around. a lot of talk going to happen.
usually
thanks :)
i like making useless stuff :(
I need to find an informative doc on how to work the user accs / groups ...
ph@Juliana:~$ sudo synaptic
sh: kde-config: not found
sh: kde-config: not found
Segmentation fault
Ph0n7r1c: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
mknarr: man group
its say kde-config not found how can that be i am using gnome
oh one thing i like about my client: when you send a msg to a channel which yo dont have permissions for (like ##linux whe you arent voiced), it gives your message a strikethrough
I seem to remember a website with deb packages for ubuntu. I tried installing ettercap-ng with the repos, but it errors out every time. I need that deb package or to install from source. Anyone know the name of the site?
mknarr: man useradd          man groupadd
n/m I found it
sdegutis: That's useful
ogre: :) sometimes we jog our memory just by formulating questions.
What is the difference between the file "group" and "group-"
im guessing the one with the - is a backup?
Does 11.04 go live tonight?
mknarr: right
it goes live the 20 sometime
woot
the 28***
kinda..
I cant wait
although it doesnt have private messaging yet
lolwut
i forgot it's so soon
What are the major changes for 11.04?
sdegutis: Well, get back to work!
https://launchpad.net/ubuntu/+milestone/ubuntu-11.04 <-- "Expected:
    12 minutes ago"
EnderW: They are widespread and often.
EnderW: (...sorry, couldn't resist...)
plop
What's the time? (I'm in europe... ;))
lawl
im looking for a good command line sound processing tool.  something CLI like sox but im looking for a specific feature, very slight audio length expansion/contraction.  basically, i have an audio source that gets 1 second off sync of another one after ~4 hours.  this means i need 3.33 samples out of 48000 removed from the slower source.  does anyone know of a proggy that can help me do that
?
anyone can tell me if apt: links work when using :// ? like apt://build-essential ?
Roydi: europe spans MANY timezones
Roydi: 2:14
Roydi: (... sorry, again, I couldn't resist...)
Would it matter if i edit the group file  to display eachgroup on a diff line ?
how long till 11.04 is out?
/usr/libgconf2-4/gconf-sanity-check-2exited with code 256 what is it and how do i fix it
... it kinda violates the spirit of the RFCs but dokuwiki thinks apt is a namespace if I don't use :// :(
mknarr: they are already on separate lines.
hmm weird  i DLed the file from my server to look at it
and everything is on 1 line
ssfdre38: ask in #ubuntu+1 natty isofftopic here
ActionParsnip, my timezone isn't important for my question :) Okay, let's ask a different way - When will Natty release in MY timezone (GMT+1)? :)
mknarr: With what app. are you viewing it?
Sorry ;)
usr13, notepad
Roydi: ask in #ubuntu+1 natty is offtopic here
mknarr:  That is why.
notepad+ needs a linux build
mknarr: i suppose you would have to toggle wordwrap on or of or something... I dono....
 hello room
Im guessing that when im viewing the group  doc that if there isnt a usr/acc type beside a group it isnt in use?
itguru: Just another day in the life of a Ubuntu community....  :-)
It's THURSDAY!
Anybody know how to connect a logitech C210 webcam to ubuntu? I'm having nothing but headaches
what are you guy s up to and whats new on ubuntu
hammer
?
?
itguru: it's the day after WEDNESADY
mknarr: Just means that no one has joined the group yet.
mknarr, could be in use on the fs though
itguru: welcome to the calendar
ActionParsnip: True, but *this* thursday is special :)
escott, aah true
itguru: true, but not yet
ie the root
hi everybody
/usr/libgconf2-4/gconf-sanity-check-2exited with code 256 what is it and how do i fix it
escott:  yea that's right
reeceb: run:  lsusb   use the 8 character hex id to find guides. Logitech refuse to support linux so I suggest you avoid their products
How much of a performance increase would i find if i installed a ssd in my desktop
i dont really use it for anything intense as it is
somebody use 3 monitor with 2 gpu on ubuntu?
ActionParsnip: Well, according to my calender, the position of the sun, and BBC News, I should be re installing all my test machines to 11.04 stable :)
reeceb, have you checked the v4l website
xiambax: loading apps and the OS will improve
should i be making say a user called WEB for my web stuff and adding the group "www-data" to it ?
brb i will check newegg for prices
itguru: all that is moot, depends when the servers get updated
Dammit! Still 10.10 !
lol
itguru, why not just update-manager -d
ActionParsnip: I'm just screwing around, I was kinda hoping that this time it woulda happened at midnight, but hey
itguru: 11.04 here ;)
lsusb sees the camera but I don't know how to get to it
no worries, been running beta for weeks
!?
reeceb, and you have v4l installed
reeceb: thats just the ID, use it to find uides
Where you at Actionparrship so I can get it too lol
itguru: while true; do date; sleep 1; done
*guides
reeceb, cheese
I just installed ubuntu this last week for an embedded systems project so I'm still learning the terminal stuff
I'm not sure if I have V4l installed
reeceb install synaptic sudo apt-get synaptic, and then use it to install cheese and the v4l2 tools
oem is gone...?
wtracy1: hehe! nice! But sleep is for wimps - i'm gonna have all my desktop users asking me where is the awesome new interface that I've been rubbing in their faces on my dell tablet for weeks
reeceb, also check the v4l website to see if your camera version is supported
Sweet. Thanks guys. I'll start there.
somebody know how configure 2 gpu and 3 monitor? i will install natty, but i dont know about that :(
zzecool: please don't away like that
http://www.newegg.ca/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16820139428 this should be more then enough to save my OS on
16gb?
somebody know how configure 2 gpu and 3 monitor? i will install natty, but i dont know about that :(
you can get a 32 gig usb drive lol
robert05ad: I've had it since alpha 2
oh ok
I just bought the vertex 2 160, looove it
should have waited on the vertex 3 lol
oh noes, its the 28th!
not yet basso
robert05ad: for me it is! :D
i need a little help setting up conky. I understand how to create a .conkyrc config file. but i downloaded a setup that is in LUA format and it tells me to put it in ~/.conky (but i dont see a .conky file in my home file)
basso: your in good company, we're all waiting :)
^^
somebody know how configure 2 gpu and 3 monitor? i will install natty, but i dont know about that :(
KaAtta, I have no idea what that even is lol
brisky83, thats a rather exotic configuration, are these ati or nvidia
KaAtta, you gotta make a .conkyrc file
Captainkrtek, whats up man
KaAtta: the file needs creating, you ca find sample files on the web
hiexpo, hte conky setup i downloaded is in lua format, and it wants me to place it in the .conky directory. which is supposed to be in my user folder, but im not seeing it
escott: i have 2 ati, in a mainbord asus rog formula IV
hey mknarr
escott: 3870 and 4850 ati
KaAtta: la | .con*
just got home from work
hiexpo, ActionParsnip here is the link with the file i downloaded and the instructions http://www.techdrivein.com/2011/02/6-awesome-conky-configs-that-just-works.html
ati is notoriously bad for linux support.
KaAtta: .conkyrc is a file, not a folder
those wont sli brisky
usb wouldnt be faster then SATA ssd
Is there documentation that explains how to use OpenLDAP utilities with OpenSSL instead of GnuTLS?
KaAtta, when you create a file with . first it is hidden so open open folder click view and than show hidden files
KaAtta: Ups, sorry: la | grep .con*
ActionParsnip, i linked the URL i was going off of, could u take a look and see if u can understand what it wants form me?
hiexpo, i have enabled hidden folders already
KaAtta, should be .conkyrc down towards the bottom
katsrc: you need to extract the folder then run the commands on http://gnome-look.org/content/show.php/conky_grey?content=137272
hiexpo: there's a method listed on the page above
robert05ad: i read about bad on ati supporting linux, i dont use crossfire, and i dont need it, i will not gaming on it, but i use 2 gpu for use 3 monitor
ActionParsnip, i know conky very well   :)
brisky83, crossfire support is not listed as supported http://www.x.org/wiki/RadeonFeature
hiexpo: if you read the link, it gives instructions to run, so conkyrc isnt needed
robert05ad: but when i try it on maverik i becoma mad with it and came back on win7, but i love natty on my netbook and i want use on big pc
escott: hes not trying to crossfire
hiexpo, ActionParsnip qin i figured it out guys, i had to create a folder and paste the lua into it
there was no previous folder, i had to create the directory. its working now :D
acicula, brisky83  ok. my connection dropped
brisky83: you may have to run xorg  on each card, so no unified desktop
ActionParsnip, ya that is silly using lua
escott: thanks but i dont care about crossfire, i only want 3 monitor in mutliscreen
brisky83, i think acicula is right. i don't know if xinerama would work, but you could run two different x servers on different cards
hiexpo: it works so I don't argue with it
KaAtta, why you using lua ?
hi guys i need a an information,the realese about ubuntu 11.04?
hiexpo: Conky is configured using lua.
hiexpo, i was googling "conky configs" with a time filter of hte last year, and i saw that setup that was pretty
hiexpo, so i wanted
escott: acicula i read about it, cinerama on maverick wont work :( but i read to start 2 xconfig with single card everytime , and copy on 1 after all that
armor-64: ask in #ubuntu+1
when will be available 11.04 ?
Jordan_U, yes but not hard to make your own rc file
rendero: When it's ready.
actionparnip:thnks man
arand, when will be ready xD ?
brisky83: http://superuser.com/questions/257676/ubuntu-3-monitors-2-video-cards-not-working , seems you can get away with just running one xserver.
acicula: thanks i save it, and i will try after i download the dayly natty, im a "newbie" but i really love use ubuntu also in desktop pc
brisky83: i remember using xinerama before, it can be a bit fiddly and dont know if you can configure it using a desktop wizard either, so can be a bit fiddly
rendero: Before 29th
oh is natty released?
ADMINS: think about putting this somewhere in Ubottu or something. I've decided this is a good way to learn more linux. http://tldp.org/LDP/intro-linux/html/index.html
acicula: im downloading the daily of 27/04 i guess is the same of official of today
arand, but i saw schedule and its written 28th :S
question: do I have to upgrade to 10.10 before I can upgrade to natty? (now 10.04)
tripelb: Yes
KaAtta, here is my conky   http://tinypic.com/r/34fzo6g/7
You can install 11.04 fresh
tripelb: 10.04 LTS?
arand, thanks
um, 10.04 - is there more than one kind?
no there isnt
stay on 10.04 its the better one to be on
this one ssfdre38 - You are using Ubuntu 10.04 LTS
                - the Lucid Lynx - released in April 2010 and supported until April 2013.
	
!isitout
It's out soon! Join #ubuntu-release-party and await release with the other excited folks :D
oh ssfdre38 that's easy. at what point would I move onto 10.10 ?
the next LTS is out
how can i export database of banshee ?
isnt 10.10 stable?
10.04 its good for 3 years of support
actually released?
10.10 and 11.04 gets 18 months of support
LTS just means its supported for a longer period, and supposedly a little more stable then the usual intermediary versions
sancas: ~/.config/banshee-1/banshee.db
i mean.. it is a simple dist-upgrade
next LTS is 12.04
sancas: that's an sqlite3 database that you can use if you're so inclined
10.04 moo betta Macer
hiexpo, nice, but thats a bit too complicated for my girlfriend lol
bloopletech, and to restore? only paste in the same place?
KaAtta, 10.04 is too complicated for your girlfriend?
KaAtta, only took me 30 minutes to make it
sancas: I believe so
!party
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
sancas: assuming you're on the samish version of banshee
tripelb, no he was talking bout my conky
O
O
nite everybody
is this server's full of programmers?)
[Messer]: nah, but I'm a programmer.
escott and others, thanks a ton. I'm up and running with cheeze now I'm just wondering how to directly access the video feed for processing
hi
reeceb, its /dev/video0 but v4l does lots of nice stuff (like flipping my upside down camera the right way)
» uncmar » the most of channels are linux, ubuntu etc.. O_o ))
KaAtta, kk
bloopletech, thanks for the help. I'm too tired to remember how to get there now.
tripelb: WRT your other questions, the easiest way to partition your drives is probably to burn a livecd, boot into that and use gparted to divide your drive in half - though you may want swap partitions for each installation
reeceb, i would recommend using gstreamer to get the stream, or look at the v4l docs there may be bindings for popular languages
gstreamer?
uncmar: on an lcd, each pixel is mad eup of three lights: a red a green and a blue one
[Messer]: isn't it great?  Linux is taking over.  Well, at least becoming a bit more popular.
and how do I get to dev/video0
» uncmar » yup, man, you're right =)
subpixel rendering means controlling the individual lights to achieve a better result
reeceb, media framework included in gnome. what do you want to do with your camera video? and what language do you want to use?
greetings; what are some ways to set up my hard disk partitions?
Just now was the first time I joined this channel since last year,  or maybe I joined once earlier this year or something
hopefully C and do some minor vision detection with openCV
revButl, are you asking for suggested partition layouts or tools to partition
suggested partition layouts please
eh, CRT's display with the same RGB combo.  Hence, 24 bit color.  8 bits per the trio.
uncmar: well no
I have openCV installed and am using Harpia to prototype my algorythms but my end target system is a beagleboard
revButl, how many disks do you have, how much space, what are your goals/uses for the system, how would you prioritize things like backups vs performance vs flexibility
uncmar: crts work by projecting beams through a phosphor coating at the screen
reeceb, see if someone has codesamples for openCV and v4l2 im sure its been done many times
Why was Grub2 v1.97 and not just 2.0?
tripelb: regarding accessing your other hard drive: if you go Places -
au-contrarian, 2.0 hasn't been released yet, but they really liked the features and thought it was stable enough
decreasing emphasis on flexibility, data recovery, then performance; i have one hard disk with about 50 gigs over half a terabyte with about half a terabyte designated for windows
how can i close banshee if when i close it if i using integration with my sound menu?
So Grub2 isn't really Grub2, it's Grub1.97
» uncmar » by the way, I'd just want to find english-speaking channel/server.. When I came here, I've got very amazed of Linux's popularity )
au-contrarian, no it is grub2 version 1.97
viva 11.04
revButl, i would suggest making a smaller partition ~15-20gigs for your operating system and configuring it as raid1 mirrored across the two disks with mdadm
hiexpo, didnt forget about u, i got terminal running a package update, taking a few minutes before i can load up my new conky config
revButl, for the rest of the disk i would have raid1 as well, and use that for your larger files, if you outgrow the storage you can either buy more or go into a raid1 degraded mode and free a half-terabyte
oh sorry i have integrated my banshee with my sound menu and i never can close it :( how can i close?
revButl, and don't forget a bit for swap space
Huh. I'm on a live CD, installing ubuntu. Installer seems to be just sitting at 79%, not looking like its doing much
why does banshee not work with ipod?
what works with ipod
is the current heuristic for swapspace to be 2x the amount of memory you have still?
!countdown
revButl, im sure you can get many other opinions
mrdeb: it does work with most ipods, what ipod do you have?
mrdeb: a mac or windows.  but, linux?  I don't know.  I won't buy an ipod.
shuffle
!isitout | multipass
multipass: It's out soon! Join #ubuntu-release-party and await release with the other excited folks :D
escott, hiexpo - thanks.
mrdeb: what happens when you try to sync?
sancas: open a terminal and do killall -9 banshee - that will forcibly terminate banshee
computerwiz_222: it does nto see it
au-contrarian, welcome np
mrdeb: does it mount it as a device in the file manager?
au-contrarian, those gnu people tend to be a little picky about having all the details right with unimportant stuff like a bootloader ;)
i don't want to configure my computer so that i lose education or entertainment potential; i just remember Ubuntu putting about 5 partitions on my hard disk;
computerwiz_222: no
mrdeb: also.. what ipod shuffle? the latest one?
no
What should I do if my installer just seems to sitting at a certain percentage (in this case, 79%)... Seemingly not doing anything.
mrdeb: it should work just fine.. i hate to ask.. is it plugged in?
revButl, you only need 2
revButl, thats not really necessary, its a throwback from the old days of unix sysadmins when each disk was 10megs
revButl: you can just make a main partition and a swap partition - it's not really special how you configure it and it won't change your entertainment potential
revButl, 90% of people have 2 (/ and swap) some add a couple more for /home or /boot
ok thanks guys
jajja bloopletech thanks never thought of it :D
also, you can resize and add partitions later if you want
it's not 2000 anymore :D
sancas: np
computerwiz_222: yes
when is natty releasing?
now
viranch: sometime in the next 24hours probablky
escott- then name is just maddening.  There is Grub, I get that, and that never really had a version 1, it just went up to 0.97 - and then they decide to release Grub2 but that is version 1.97 - seriously WTF?  They could have at least called Grub2 v1.0
How long should "creating user" really take when installing ubuntu? Has been sitting at that in the installer for about 5 mins now.
mrdeb: not released yet!
bloopletech: not a fixed time?
viranch: no
au-contrarian, its understandable it is a bootloader and all
viranch: I think they leave it flexible in case there are last minute issues
bloopletech: Ok..
au-contrarian, it could have a version number like latex which is always fun
suddenly my comp is running slow
what should i do??
induz, what has changed
viranch: you can join #ubuntu-release-party if you like and await 11.04
 nothing has changed
hello
hiexpo, ok bud, here is the setup i went with http://i55.tinypic.com/4oo5j.png
induz, see if anything is using cpu in gnome-system-monitor
induz: Start -
bloopletech: sounds nice! thanks
then click the cpu column to sort desecending
KaAtta, what is that desktop widget
hey türk olanvarmı
also try clicking the memory column and sort decending to see if something's taking up all your ram
viranch: np
Why would my install seemingly stop... installing and just sit at 79%?
hey türk olanvarmı
hey türk olan varmı
escott which? the guages?
Ziber, can you click on details anywhere
escott: nope...
KaAtta, yes the "speedometer" for cpu
KaAtta, pretty kool you using kde huh
hiexpo, no, using gnome, 10.10
Ziber, what was the last thing it said it was doing, or is it just a progress bar?
why?
is there anyway i can find what r the processes running
escott: Progress bar, 79%, "creating user..."
 most of the processes r sleeping
escott, that is conky, i just installed it and configured it using a setup i found online
 but available swap is just 3%
KaAtta, cool
induz: something is chewing your ram
induz in terminal: ps aux
induz: try sorting by memory usage descending
Ziber, have you already entered your username info? wondering if there is a popup somewhere behind a window
escott: I already have, came before it.
that is gnome KaAtta oh with bar on bottom forgot what that is called looks like kde   but now that i look at i know
escott: no other window associated with it.
the bar im using is cairo-dock
bloopletech, yes all you say is true. I can access them. I cannot copy them because I dont have permission. when I log into the other drive I cannot even see my normal filesystem. I can only see the filesystem I am on and 2 windows partitions and one NTFS partions. (I have 3 drives mounted.)
im still trying to figure out how to get composite to work on my LDXE setup, been trying for days
cant get any help in lubuntu channel
Ziber, can you run stuff from the live cd, namely the system monitor and see if anything is happening
any help with a intel 845ge video card on board i found nothing to help in google
hi all...if in proftpd, i want to create a user, and lock them into a directory, say like /home/user/Pictures, do I have to create that user in ubuntu (cli or otherwise?)
escott: where would i find that? slightly new to ubuntu.
ps aux throws a list of % CPU and i dont know what to do with them
KaAtta, oh ok that lbuntu  not gnome
tripelb: ah I see. To deal with the permissions issue you may be able to run gksudo nautilus and copy the files in that window
tripelb: I'm not sure why you can't see the partition from the other installation
hiexpo, the screentshot is gnome, i ALSO have another machine running lubuntu, but i cant get composite to work on it
netmsi, when you install proftpd it should create a user for the app, the restriction bit is part of the proftpd config, there is a gui for proftpd as well
hi everybody i`m in such a big problem i have intented to remove a libusb package but instead i have pressed libusb* then all dependant package are removed how can i fix this?/?
Is there a way to determine if I am running Ubuntu 32 or 64 bit?
how can i make it run fatser as earlier??
syddraf: uname -a
KaAtta, lookslike lkde to me but ok
Ziber, did you boot the live cd to the desktop environment then start the install or did you just take the first install option
escott, i tried gadmin, and it seems like webmin is just as viable as an option, but what if i want to create user other than the default?
bloopletech, I copy what you say and do it another day. Peace. Thanks a lot for working with me.
I'm having trouble setting the PS1 variable as a non-root user. \u doesn't give the proper output. When I set my variable with PS1='\u\$', I get exactly that as my prompt.
induz: Go to the task manager, sort by memory usage descending then click the top item and click kill process
tripelb: np
KaAtta, nevermind   i didnt scrol up   lol
hiexpo, the screenshot is gnome, 10.10, all i have done is changed background, added the dock, added conky, and removed bottom panel
that is it lol
induz: repeat until success
bloopletech: It returns 2.6.32-31-generic-pae #61-Ubuntu SMP Fri Apr 8 20:00:13 UTC 2011 i686 GNU/Linux
hai
syddraf: you're 32-bit
netmsi, you could do that but there are various things you have to be aware of like, making sure the user has /dev/null as their shell and some pam stuff, better to use the suggested user
bloopletech: Thank you. I appreciate it.
syddraf: np
where can i locate the covert art of the song is playing rigth now? im using banshee2.0
hai
oi!!1
its getting better now
what??
do i have to perform this KILL process everytime
i love yiou
anybody know what time natty goes live?
no
hypetech: there is no set time
k
oi
oi
oi
mupeng: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
hi i have installed ubuntu from a cd that my friend gave me, and am having trouble getting my graphics to look right. I have got pretty much everything the way i want it but the video is messed up looking. here is a list of some commands. http://pastebin.com/EupuENiB
escott, so multiple users are not advisable? what if i need three separate users each with their own direct.?
induz: only if a program is doing something wrong and using memory badly
induz: not usually
netmsi, you can only have one service on a single port
KaAtta, should use 10.04 did you look what kernal i was using   :)
netmsi, so proftpd has to run as someone, and various restrictions should be put around that user, which they do by default, so that if someone does intrude into proftpd the damage they can do is minimal
jstrap: what's wrong with the video at the moment? is the resolution too low or...
i didnt
super fast
escott, but it supports multiple connections (forgive the ignorance)?
hiexpo, i really wanna try 11.04 but i cant get the beta to boot for me if my life depended on it
^ KaAtta
bloopletech, its getting a bit better by killing some of the processes
bloopletech, yes, thats what it is.
hello
jstrap: try going to System -
KaAtta, leave 11.04 alone 10.04 has better support
escott, maybe i'm using the wrong word when i say users..multiple logins?
jstrap: see if it will let you increase the resolution
upgraded from 10.04 to 10.10 and only have one resolution
I need some help with a realtek driver
bloopletech, but i really dont know what i am killing as names are not familiar except few like mozila and thunderbird
netmsi, give me a sec to confirm what i am saying is true ;)
can any budy hekp me??
induz: true, it is a bit risky
escott, thank you..
induz: I mean if you're not sure, rebooting should sort it out
KaAtta, always better to stay with the lts versions    :)
netmsi, so there is a distinction between a remote shell ala ssh and an service like http
Realtek Driver any here body out there who can help??
bloopletech, I tried that, but it seems i dont have any driver installed maybe? would there be a program by nvidia if i did?
jstrap: you have an nvidia chipset?
george, sure what chipset ?
ive used 10.10 more then anything and to be honest, right now im loving it. im pretty new to linux and im having a fairly easy time figuring it out
i have no idea?
is boult in
hiexpo,  i really wish my othe rmachine was capable of running 10.10
netmsi, when you ssh into a server you have an account running as your user on that server, when you http into a server you are asking an httpd program like apache to do things on your behalf, proftpd can do a bit of both, but the safer thing is to set it up like an httpd server
bloopletech, yes
jstrap: If so, then I believe you have two options: the driver that nvidia supplies, and a new open-source driver built by the community
KaAtta, 10.04 can do more   :)
jstrap: I'd suggest maybe trying both if you're not sure - I don't have nvidia so I can't recommend which one
let me link you
question is, will it run smoothly on my other machine?
hiexpo: what's the benefit of 10.04?
george, not a usb ?
my other machine has issues running 10.10 but runs lubuntu 10.10 just fine
bloopletech, Im sure i have nvidia, but i dont know exactly what i have in this laptop, if that makes any sense lol
escott, ok...i think i understood that answer..you'll have to forgive, am just learning about ftp..still hasnt quite coalesced methinks
netmsi, so when proftpd gets a connection request it authenticates against a list of usernames which need not be real users of the server (without a account or /home, so the only thing they can do is ftp), and then forks and processes their requests
jstrap: yeah np. DO you know what version of ubuntu you have installed?
hypetech, you can hack t better   :)
install virtualbox 4.0.6 with ubuntu 11.04, but /etc/init.d/vboxdrv is missing. Anyone please?
hypetech, and it lts
netmsi, if you want a service for people who have accounts on the server already consider ssh and sftp
digdeep: oh you want to virtualmachine Ubuntu 11.04?
hiexpo, what does LTS stand for?
escott, yes, that was my question...so how do i create those accounts (not on the server, just for ftp purposes?
!lts | KaAtta
KaAtta: LTS means Long Term Support. LTS versions of Ubuntu will be supported for 3 years on the desktop, and 5 years on the server. The current LTS version of Ubuntu is !Lucid (Lucid Lynx 10.04)
KaAtta, long term support
wrong channel, sorry
bloopletech, the cd that he gave me was blank, but i think its 9.04. I thought if i installed all the updates it might fix it, but it didnt
digdeep: I can link you to some proper instructions on how to virtual machine 11.04
netmsi, its part of the proftpd config haven't done it in some time though
no hiexpo is a built in to a toshiba
hiexpo, sebsebseb ty both
digdeep: actsaully I think for a virtual machine of 11.04, even though 11.04 isn't out just yet, this channel would be sort of ok, because you could be virtual machining it with a previous version of Ubuntu,  as host,  and you could with another distro as host as well
jstrap: ok, you have a couple options. You can upgrade your ubuntu to a later version (which is different to installing the updates); this is probably a good idea anyway as 9.04 is a few years old now
KaAtta, i boot in 32 secs   :)
netmsi, ftp is discouraged for a lot of reasons, if you can use ssh and sftp thats better
escott, i don't mind figuring it out myself, but what is that login called in proftpd? 'user', 'account', etc.?
either way you can switch to the nvidia supplied drivers if you like - here is a howto https://help.ubuntu.com/community/BinaryDriverHowto/Nvidia
escott, thanks again. I've found some stuff online and I'm callin' it for the evening. Take it easy
reeceb_, np
george, ok you need to get the info of it and i can probally help you than
ok
netmsi, virtual users i think
escott, unfortunately not...the people i want to share file w/ are not technical...i can set them up w/ a ftp client, they can hang..
hi is there a way to get apt-get to tell me how many updates are available?
hey I'm having a problem on ubuntu 11.04 gdm login: "There is a problem with the configuration server. (/usr/lib/libgconf2-4/gconf-sanity-check-2 exited with status 256"
escott, cool...
 let me see if i can toshiba drivers for win 7 dose not have info on the chipset only on the units compatible
auxin... try sudo apt-get update
jstrap: the current Long Term Support release of ubuntu is 10.04 lucid, and the latest version is 10.10 maverick
bloopletech, ok. guess it was worth the try cause i learned a few thing but ill just have to do a fresh install of a later distro. thanks for the help though :)
jstrap: although 11.04 natty is coming out in the next day or so ;)
Ziber, you still waiting on that install
jstrap: ok -though you can upgrade ubuntu over the internet if you want
reves, hmm no that doesnt work, thanks though
hi, natty beta 2 install freezes after i click next on the screen where you specify whether you want to download updates / install restricted stuff.  anyone else seen this before?
jstrap: assuming you have a decent internet connection
Im looking for something like aptitudes $aptitude search ~U
but only for apt-get
george, open terminal and type   
bloopletech, maybe ill just wait for 11.04, might be worth it
i tried both normal and alternate install iso
apt-cache search
<hiexpo
george,   f   <     wine
MacGyverNL, excellent, thanks!
Yw.
00:00.0 Host bridge: Intel Corporation Core Processor DRAM Controller (rev 02)
        Subsystem: Toshiba America Info Systems Device fd00
        Flags: bus master, fast devsel, latency 0
        Capabilities: <access denied>
        Kernel driver in use: agpgart-intel
george: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
        Kernel modules: intel-agp
george,  give me output of that command
Why wont my partition mount, i can't even force mount it
is there any other way to mount it
Adis45: Which partition?
Adis45: Are you sure it's not alreday mounted?
Its not
its my other hard disk
Adis45: Is it listed in fstab?
whats that
Ok, I want to give my kids read only access to the Music samba share, but I want my wife and I to have read/write access...how do I set that up, please?
Adis45: fdisk -l | pastebinit   #And send us the resulting URL
RedLance: groups
RedLance, if your wife and kids are the only users on the system then put your wife and you in a group say "parents" and chgrp the directory and all contents to "parents"
RedLance: man addgroup  man group
!permissions | RedLance
RedLance: An explanation of what file permissions are and how they can be manipulated can be found at https://help.ubuntu.com/community/FilePermissions
usr13: http://pastebin.com/zZBGMALC
RedLance, then revoke w permission from other
its /dev/sda2
george: FloodBot is not sentient.
escott, in the proftpd.conf file, is has a commented out template for an anonymous login..just copy that and make the appropriate changes?
Ok, thanks everybody!
so can any help me??
netmsi, that would be for anonymous (no password login) so if thats what you want sure
george: Drivers do not work in Wine
Adis45: You would have to mount it with admin priviledges, (unless you specify that users can in the /etc/fstab file)
george: or commmercial versions that are sold, for that matter
I do mount it with admin privileges
o crap
do you want me to pastebin the error I get?
so what can u do?
that might help
Adis45: Yes
george, i told you what to do   run that command in the terminal so i know what chipset it has
escott, def. not...but that configuration works for adding a user, and adding a password or psswd line to the file, or is a waste going that route?
netmsi, it may be different. http://www.proftpd.org/docs/howto/VirtualUsers.html
george, lspci -v | less
george: and with  hardware it depends on the dsitro, if it just works or doesn't,  in general Linux distro's tend to work quite well with pretty standard PC hardware though. and hiexpo can probably help you properly :)
Does it change anything if I admit that the wife and kids access the samba server with Windows?  I use Ubuntu of course, and the samba server is Ubuntu too.  Are groups still the way to go?
netmsi, the key thing is you want them to have the least priviliged access to the system, preferably nobody or guest
RedLance: sure if set up right for Samba, you can do what you want, not sure how to do that myself though
fron the board is an intel
?
escott, gotcha...it's just the mechanics that are screwing me up..
usr13: http://pastebin.com/qbVYBK5i
netmsi, but you don't actually want to put a password on nobody or guest, and then have ftp passing that around in the clear, so I would put a password in the AuthUserFile for "nobody" and then tell them to login with that password and see if you can make that work.
netmsi, understandable ftp is screwed up
gconf-snaity-check-2 exited with code 256...it says i have no internet but i do, i can't update..things close randomly..how do i fix this
sanity
Adis45: That's great, but I do not see the command you used that generated the error.
;;bc,mtgox
usr13: ok let me redo it
Communication controller: Intel Corporation 5 Series/3400 Series Chipset HECI Controller (rev 06)
is there a direct upgrade from 10.10 to 11.04 that you can do?
ubusammyn150: can't get anything from the repo's anymore?
Communication controller: Intel Corporation 5 Series/3400 Series Chipset HECI Controller (rev 06)
multipass: yes, but wait untill the final is out first, oh and if you do it on release day it may be rather slow to do
escott, thanks so much...gonna go try some things out..most probably be back ...but appreciate immensely...
netmsi, if you want it to be pretty you can put a different name on the nobody UID in that AuthUserFile and then they can signin as mrrogers if that makes more sense
i dont know what to get..sudo apt-get reconfigure isnt working either
it is version 10.04
anyone here can help me with a wifi driver
netmsi so nobody is 65534, you could have alice:65534\nbob:65534\ncharlie:65534 in your AuthUserFile (if I am understanding what I am reading correctly)
Decision: Probably.  Tell us what wifi device you have.
KM0201: I read it on at least one site, maybe two even
sebsebseb: very cool.. that takes "trying linux" to a whole new level.. don't even have to burn a cd
i don't know.....i have not used it....
KM0201: should be good yeah,  get people to try Unity like that first,  instead of them doing the upgrade, and then regretting it :d
i am using 10.10
Decision: lspci |grep ireless
KM0201: indeed exactly
sudo apt-get dpkg-reconfigure reports invalid
usr13,  that didnt do anything i ran it in terminal
Decision: lspci  #And just look for it.
Decision: and send us that line.
Decision, wireless not ireless
tjiggi_fo: no ireless not wireless
usr13, 0_o
tjiggi_fo: I left off the W on purpose.
where do crontab files live?
ezl, root crontab is in /etc/cron*
ezl: but you can see it via    crontab -l
ezl, user cron files in /var/local/cron?
Hi everyone.
hi, I just installed ubuntu 10.10 64 bit on an asus ul50vt laptop and went to update the nvidia driver, now when i restart I'm getting it hanging at the "checking battery state" message
i'm pretty new to linux so i'm not really understanding what to do here
ezl:   crontab -e     #To edit
miiike: Is your laptop plugged in?
miiike: how did you install the Nivida driver?
gogearvibe4g: it's not right now
KM0201: see above what I said about Gnome 3 by the way :)
sebsebseb: again, gotcha..
sebsebseb: i just clicked on "additional drivers" when i started ubuntu up for the first time and installed it through what popped up there
sebsebseb: Was just curious.... :D
gogearvibe4g: some other distro's already doing Gnome 3, and Fedora 15 will soon when it's released, and yeah.
i did that figured  oit
miiike: ok that should have worked really
sebsebseb: i actually tried gnome shell... didn't really care for it.. (it was a bit buggy for me).. but i did try the live CD for Open Suse, which had Gnome 3.. and it was very good.. i'm guessing when Gnome 3 PROPERLY hits ubuntu 11.10, it will be much better
usr13,  its a realtek
miiike: ,but really you don't need the  propritary driver installed in 10.10, unless you want some compiz effects, or a few 3D games,  11.04 which will come out pretty soon from now,  well things are a bit differnet there,  because the 3D version of the new Unity interface needs a propritary driver or experimental 3D driver.  in fact if you only just put 10.10 on a lap top, I would suggest waiting untill a bit later and then putting 11.04 on.
miiike: hmmm......
sebsebseb, what video card he have ?
nvidia
sebsebseb: oh okay.  how do I remove it now that i've installed it? lol
add the nvidia repos   :)
miiike, since this froze up on battery state have you tried booting while plugged in
gogearvibe4g: so is #ubuntu-release-party!
how long guys?
rww: YEA!!!!
!isitout
It's out soon! Join #ubuntu-release-party and await release with the other excited folks :D
escott: yeah I just tried it and it does the same thing when plugged in
Did you just barely install??
miiike, whatnvidia card is it ?
GeForce G210M
miiike: was a new install? I had a simmilar problem and reinstalled and it worked out fine
its an asus ul*c right. does that have switchable graphics? is it a core i-series
miiike, wow thats old   
gogearvibe4g: yeah i just installed it clean a few minutes ago
hiexpo: i have no idea, a friend just gave me this laptop lol
hiexpo, i think they spun the 210s into a mobile low power variant, its actually pretty new iirc
miiike it maybe a bad install. Try again and see what happens
miiike, you might also see if you have switchable graphics options in the bios and explicitly selecting one
why ktorrent
dl so slow
codex maybe you didn't forward your port?
miiike, did you go to /system/admin/hardwaredrivers   
i agree with escott, see if that is that case BEFORE reinstall
:D
hey guys, is it possible to setup a connection to openvpn without installing a 3rd party client?
escott, okay i'll look
is forwared
hiexpo, no i didn't, i'm still just kind of trying to learn my way around linux, this is my first time playing with it so i don't really know too much of what i'm doing
even sudo apptitude is telling me there is no drive "e" when i try to re-install libs
what is the command to reconfigure ubuntu?
ubusammyn150, ubuntu doesn't use drive letters
usr13,  so what  do i need to do i can get the realtek driver for linux
yea it does
ubusammyn please specify "reconfigure ubuntu"
lol
usr13, no idea how to instal it though
a .tar.bz2 file
and it really doesn't use them :)
like sudo apt-get dpkg-reconfigure is not working what is wrong?
miiike, go there and open that dir   first and see if there is a pro driver there if so click it and it will say not in use click it and use it
anyone know what is the best tv viewer for tv tuner card with philips chip on it ?
ubusammyn150, sudo apt-get install program-name-goes-here
ubusammyn150: just do sudo dpkg-reconfigure <package>
hiexpo, how do i get there? it hangs everytime i try and start my laptop
!best | CooKieMonster
CooKieMonster: Usually, there is no single "best" application to perform a given task. It's up to you to choose, depending on your preferences, features you require, and other factors. Do NOT take polls in the channel. If you insist on getting people's opinions, ask BestBot in #ubuntu-bots.
what if i want to reconfigure everything
miiike, hmm
you reinstall ubusammyn
wth is libacme-brainfuk-perl?
orry squall your ignored
Oo
miiike: You have installed nvidia driver and you don't have gui any more?  Is that your situation?
soo what exactly would i type...the entire name of the os kernal version?
ubusammyn150, brainfuck is a programming language known for being very hard to understand. used more as a challenge for programmers
usr13, i just installed ubuntu, and installed that nvidia driver, and now when my laptop starts up it gets to "checking battery state" and hangs there
miiike, push esc button on boot and see it you can boot in safe mode
how do i install torrents?
ubusammyn150, you will have to explain more what you mean "reconfigure"
!torrent | linuxdemon
miiike: so you can not login?
linuxdemon: Torrent clients: Transmission (GTK and terminal-based), Deluge-Torrent, Freeloader, BitStormLite, BitTornado-GUI (GTK), KTorrent (KDE), QTorrent (Qt), Azureus (Java), TorrentFlux (web-based), bittornado, rTorrent, cTorrent, bittorrent, aria2 (terminal-based) - FAQ: http://www.bittorrent.com/FAQ.html - See also !P2P
linuxdemon, you don't install torrents
miiike: Describe the screen.
usr13, nope, i can't do anything, it just stops at the black screen
hiexpo, i'll try that
i know that i download them but i have yet to figure out how to install the programs
miiike, good luck   :)
libgconf2-4 gconfsanity?? is reporting error 256
how do we connect remotely?
linuxdemon, we can't really help you install a program you downloaded off a torrent. we don't even know what it is
miiike: Ctrl-Alt-F6
im trying to install parallels
linuxdemon, when you download them click open with and should be default transmission
miiike try shift too, to get the grub menu
'xterm-new': unknown terminal type.
miiike: (Hold Ctrl and Alt keys while hitting    F6
anyone getting this on 10.10
miiike: And then login...
!piracy | linuxdemon
linuxdemon: piracy discussion and other questionably legal practices are not welcome in the Ubuntu channels. Please take this discussion elsewhere or abstain from it altogether. This includes linking to pirated software, music, and video. Also see !guidelines and !o4o
usr13, that worked to log me in, i don't really know what to do from there though
i want to repair version 10.04 via terminal...
the entire os
not just one package or module
jeremymcs, where are you getting this problem
miiike: Now what error were you getting?
ubusammyn150, have you tried virtualbox?
Hi all, is it safe to use the gui frontend to APT (synaptic?) and CLI APT mixed?
ubusammyn150, and how would parallels help you exactly !xy | ubusammyn150
hi... wanted to ask if it is worth migrating to btrfs at this stage
some packages are installed virtually and should not be
usr13, i wasn't getting a specific error, it would just hang when it got to "Checking Battery State" when it was booting
lucus, no not really
escott: whenever i type something, lol
wth does virtualbox have anything to do with what i'm trying to do?
it  doesnt
jeremymcs, its probably something in your .bashrc did you mess with that
miiike: So this was right after install?
ubusammyn150, sorry confused you with linuxdemon
escott: nope
=/
clean install, out of box ive gotten this on 2 machines
MrBean, yes
usr13, i installed it and it started up with no problems, then i went to "additional drivers" and it suggested an nvidia driver, so i installed that and restarted and since i restarted it's been hanging at the battery message
jeremymcs, its something about the terminal client you are using. it is reporting itself as xterm-new instead of xterm, and that is causing problems in the bashrc or somewhere
escott: term is set for xterm-new .. and it gets that error
miiike: ls /etc/X11/xorg.conf
escott: was thinking about all those goodies about subvolumes and compression. Seems a good scenario for dualbooting and installing other distros on the same partition. Is it very unstable at the moment?
miiike: What does that ^^^ say?
Hey I just installed ubuntu 11.04 on a dell mini 9, replacing a mac osx installation.  When I try to boot I get "boot0: error", but if I boot through a thumb drive I can get into ubuntu fine.  Is there a way to fix the bootloader without doing a full reinstall?
linuxdemon, try virtualbox legal, no torrents and in the apt archive
just says "
"/etc/X11/xorg.conf"
lucus, yeah... except for the random fsck errors when you get more than 15 subvolumes, and the slowness using firefox, and the unrecoverability from errors its great!
tjiggi_fo: thanks
miiike: sudo  rm /etc/X11/xorg.conf ; sudo  /etc/init.d/gdm restart
lucus, for a throwaway system by all means give it a go. but its not realistic for a system you will actually use
escott: LOL!!! You got me...
usr13, ooh, it went past it and to the login screen now
cannot open aptitude state file?
lucus, im only running it now because im taking a break before school and have lots of spare time if it goes kapute
miiike: Yea, do it.
miiike: let us know what happens.
miiike: Oh, you have login screen now?  Good!  :)
usr13, yeah haha, i'm going to restart and make sure it'll go all the way now
miiike: Sorry... didn't understand you.
escott: to be completely honest I did an install. Have 3 subvolumes at the moment. @32 @64 @home. Works fine, only booting takes ages...
miiike: Ok.
usr13, out of curiosity, what did that actually do?
miiike: just got rid of an improperly written config file.
lucus thats the fsck scans the whole drive takes 2+ minutes
miiike: ... and restarted the Xserver
can someone recommend an easy program to resize icons?
usr13, ahh okay.  it started up perfectly, thanks so much!
miiike: You removed the file   /etc/X11/xorg.conf  file and restarted gdm which is the Desktop window manager.
escott: Is it necessary to do an fsck at every boot? can't this be tuned? I remember Hardy took over 2 minutes in similar situations, but every 30 boots or so
miiike: But you are now back to the OpenSource nvidia driver.  (And not using the proprietary one you installed earlier, it is not being used anymore.)
usr13, oh okay.  from what's been explained to me i guess i don't really need the proprietary one anyway
miiike, yes you do
still, not even regognizeing sudo apt-get dpkg-reconfigure... says E: invalid operation
miiike, but you can't use compiz.
hello ubuntu
miiike: You can (now or later) try and repair it, or.. you can just keep using the OpenSource one, (which for all practical purposes, works just fine).
when does Ubuntu 11.04 come out?
ccll
tommorow
cc11rocks: Later
i know Ubuntu 11.04 comes out tomorrow
like what exact time
really?
there is no specified time
tomorrow?
okay ty
usr13, i wouldn't really even know where to begin with repairing it
no there time
bimbo lol
im already running ubuntu+1
there will be no big differences between what im running now and what gets released tomorrow
hi all
are the Beta versions different then the official ones?
xiambax, did you just answer my question?
yes, cc11rocks, they are not stable and they are not supported
cause i have the Beta version on my flash drive
could i upgread from 10.04 to 11.04 ?
all the programs kept crashing
usr13, did i miss your reply.....
varunvyas: you'd have to go through 10.10 first
ok
upgrade to 10.10 then to 11.04 when it comes out
thanks friends
np
usr13,  i have no idea how to  install the driver
miiike: well there are tools that can do that, but I think you would need to turn off the Xserver to use them.  nvidia-xconfig  is probably the one you would most likely need to use.  BUT, it is probably the utility that failed and created the error ridden /etc/X11/xorg.conf file in the first place.
I'm trying to get a pc with ubuntu 10 something to work with the s video port on the graphics card for a media pc
does anyone know how to make Ubuntu run faster? it runs quite slow on my computer
but it just rolls
or maybe it's because it on a flash drive...is there a performance drop in using a flash drive over a hard drive? i would think it would be faster in some cases
ccllrocks do you know the specs on your computer?
*it's
miiike: But, that is not to say it wouldn't work  right the next time.  Who knows...
yes i do
one sec
ccllrocks it would run way faster using a hard drive over a usb
oh
er um instad of a usb that is
cc11rocks: pastebinit /proc/cpuinfo
CPU: Intel Atom N270 @ 1.60 GHz (Diamondville 45nm Technology)
cc11rocks: pastebinit /proc/meminfo
RAM: 1.0GB Single-Channel DDR2@ 266 MHz
Motherboard: ASUSTeK Computer INC. 1005HA
cc11rocks: is that single core?
yes
Graphics: Digital flat panel 1024 X 768
cc11rocks: What did you install on it?  (What ISO?)
Mobile Intel(R) 945 Express Chipset Family
yea i can't find anything related... to my issue in google..most people gave up and re0installed from cd etc
cc11rocks: lsb_release -a
i've used 10.04, 10.10, and 11.04 Beta
they all run kinda slow
there is a version of ubuntu for older slower machines called xubuntu if I'm not mistaken (correct me if I'm wrong here )
10.04 should work with older machines?
how old is this pc?
about half a year to a year
cc11rocks: When is the last time you cracked it open and gave it a good cleaning?
it's a netbook
never usr13
i have ubuntu 11 on my samsung n150 equvilent to a asus eepc
cc11rocks: Ok.  Open it up.  Take the heat sink off, clean it really good.  Wipe the heat sink contact area and the CPU contact area with alcohol, dry it off. put on new cpu grease, put it back together.
i used wubi tho
with a netbook
?
yea
hi! i want apply a patch in my kernel (linux-image-generic-pae-2.6.38.8.22), so what is the better way to do this?
wubi isnt very popualr tho
you don't really need to clean out a netbook
cc11rocks: Oh, it's a notebook... well.. That's a bit more complicated.
That's scary man
it's fine
i could do it w/ a regular desktop
lol
not with a netbook
Decision: yes
cc11rocks: but it still could be clogged up with dust and overheating.
true
all pc's need to be cleaned, but not such a new one
then it wouldnt even get bios
running Windows 7 starter is fine
it's fast
just be sure to keep the vents open so the fans can work and if needed use a laptop cooling pad
ubusammyn150: They darn sure do in my house!  :)
i would dual boot if Ubuntu was faster...
it should be fine
lol
hai everwyone..what time exactly will be ubuntu 11.04 be released?
Decision: what's wrong? i didn't see anything
ubuntu is faster
Johny_GM: Later
that's what i asked Johny_GM
windows is slower
Johny_GM: When it's ready. There is no set time.
i know
no specified time jhony
as far as the netbook running slow there isn't much you can do. I'd make sure you aren't doing too much multitasking
!countdown
but Ubuntu is running slower on my computer
not using as much RAM, but just slower
!countdown
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
harrihu: you could try a more lightweight Desktop Manager
the ubuntu netbook versions i dont think install the proper integrated gfx drivers
cc11rocks: you could try a more lightweight Desktop Manager
cc11rocks: xfce is fast
after i install the 965 chipset drivers it seemed to run faster
Well actually I'm not worried about speed I have another problem
##namespace is the cool place to hang out. You can find most of the cool people there. In ##namespace you can just chill and do whatever and totally relax. "Take it easy" is the ##namespace motto, for example, that's how laid back it is there. Show up if you want to have a good time. Another good reason to show up is if you want to hang out with friends.
!xfce
Xubuntu is Ubuntu with Xfce instead of !GNOME. More info at http://www.xubuntu.org and http://wiki.ubuntu.com/Xubuntu/ - To install from Ubuntu: « sudo apt-get install xubuntu-desktop » - Join #xubuntu for support - See also: !Ubuntu and !Xubuntu-Channels
the s - video port rolls and is un viewable in ubuntu
I need it to work because it's a media pc
ty ubottu
worked fine in xp
loller: Don't advertise in here.
xfce is a little more limited, but not all that much.
just went to the release party chat...they say it will be April 28th somewhere in the world
lol
it's pretty nice
thats funny, dont advertise hehe
me?
just dont advertise anything ot xD
yea it the 28th is austrailia
..
it IS the 28th in Australia or it will be released on the 28th in Austrialia?
brb
!landscape
Landscape makes the management and monitoring of Ubuntu systems simple and effective by combining world-class support with easy to use online management tools. https://landscape.canonical.com/
why do i need a update for xorg savage ? my laptop is intel i915
hsajhkasa
how would landscape get installed without me telling it to?
uofm49426: because Ubuntu installs a range of Xorg drivers that fit most cards by default
greetings, I have a 10.04 server (headless, no sound card) running web, mail and pbx - I can't get mp3 audio playback to work via the pbx and left wondering:   Do I need a sound card?  Or am I missing something?
does upstart have the ability to run a job as a user other than root? keep in mind, su is not upstart and sudo is not upstart
you need a sound card
mp3 is encoded and decoded there
if you used Windows you wouldn't need to configure a sound card manually
it would just work out of the box
no cpu instruction sets are availble for mp3 codecs yet
is it possible to have gnome and gnome3, and switch between them at login?
loller stfu
mp3 codecs are included with Windows
why not with Ubuntu?
loller: stop trolling
ubusammyn150: stop feeding trolls
i wish ubuntu wouldnt i only have a 3.6 gb of extra space
he would still need a sound card
lol
ubusamyn150 thx   and rofl looler
yeah
q from a ubuntu noob...
rww, how am i feeding i want to stop feeding?
try learning to read
i've got a pkg installed that requires access to port 8010
but even though the port seems to work by doing a wget locally
ubusammyn150: "stfu" is neither acceptable language in here nor a good way to stop trolls from talking.
i can't access from something hitting my AWS instance... ideas?
agree
sorry
is it possible to have gnome and gnome3, and switch between them at login?
40 gb harddrive half windows haft ubuntu
rww_ doesn't that just mean Stop Trolling Freenet Ubuntu ?
Freenode rather
decompensation, I'm not clear on the term
Hey guys, new guy here. So deleted a user and now the damned machine keeps trying to log onto the deleted user, and I get stuck on a screen showing nothing but my desktop backgreound. So what am I doing wrong?
question. how do i uninstall programs
anyone in here make package for ubuntu
linuxdemon: synaptic or apt-get remove "programname"
linuxdemon: search for them in the software center and remove
howdy
!!!!!!!!!!who could help me i have typed by error apt-get remove libusb* then every thing is broken even lan and cd driver so i couldn`t use internet nor use apt-cdrom as source who could help me !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Error: I am only a bot, please don't think I'm intelligent :)
Anyone? C'mon, I need some help here.
thank you very much
i want a easy way bridge wifi and ethernet
hi, I am looking for a software to watch tv on ubuntu, with a tv tuner card.. Suggestions?
Mac102250 please specify, it's trying to login to the deleted user on it's own?
Mac102250: how did you delete the user?
When I turn on the computer, it tries to log directly onto the deleted user
which user did you delete? one you made yourself, or one of the premade ones? :)
Mac102250: Have a look at /etc/gdm/custom.conf
BrumDart: I clicked the admin tab and went down to the very bottom and clicked "User Groups" or something like that
ok where is the config files for synaptic/install update?
mar7ar: that's a hard one to recover from. You might have to reinstall from scratch.
!tv | infoloco
infoloco: http://www.linuxtv.org/ has extensive information about using TV cards under Linux. Available viewers for analog cards: Zapping, tvtime (GTK/GNOME), Kaffeine, kdetv (KDE), xawtv, motv. For digital cards: Me-TV (GNOME), Klear (KDE), dvb-utils. For both analog and digital cards, !MythTV is a powerful framework. Your card may work the !IVTV drivers. See also !TV-Out
for some reason update and all commands in terminal refer to E: drive or an internet connection, someone remotely connected and messed up my system
how do i tell video ram used i ubuntu
ok perfect
Mac102250: The file I gave you controls automatic login.
thks alot
Oh?
i have a intel i915gm
/etc/gdm//custom.conf
So how do i restore the config files?
hm
Mac10
 http://www.hauppauge.com/pages/faq/support_faq_linux.html
sorry-infoloco was looking for tuner software
rapeman: Welcome to #ubuntu! #ubuntu is the cool place to hang out. You can find most of the cool people there. In #ubuntu you can just chill and do whatever and totally relax. "Take it easy" is the #ubuntu motto, for example, that's how laid back it is there. Show up if you want to have a good time. Another good reason to show up is if you want to hang out with friends.
with ubuntu on an AWS instance... ubuntu firewall disabled, aws security group set to wide open (0-65535 on 0.0.0.0/0), is there any reason i shouldn't be able to connect to a port by hitting my AWS IP?
I'm using a generic-pae kernel and I want apply a patch on him. I will install linux-source and kernel-package but how do I do to active PAE support?
I boot my computer, and get dumped to tty2. switching to tty7 shows that most things loaded (I think). I log in to tty2 and running startx gives me a segfault, and says that the server is aborting.
Infoloco -here is a link for Hauppauge cards
http://www.hauppauge.com/pages/faq/support_faq_linux.html
has anyone has found something interesting on ubuntu 11.04?
mfilipe, there is no support using pae
atlgeorge: You sure the program isn't binding to localhost or something?
mfilipe: just use the PAE kernel package...
taglass: How do I edit the file? It skips and goes straight the the deleted account, and I'm unable to do anything.
!pae
To use more than ~3.2GB RAM on a 32bit system you can install the PAE-enabled kernel. See https://help.ubuntu.com/community/EnablingPAE for more info
so sorry, whoever was kind enough to reply... i accidnetally termed my channel window, can you pls repost?
can anyone tell me how to take a version of a game from one Ubuntu install and put it in another with the same program-different version?
Mac102250: I would change AutomaticLoginEnable=true to false
atlgeorge: No prob :P You sure the program isn't binding to localhost or something?
atlgeorge: 02:51:58 < syntaur
ah, nvm :)
rww_, but linux-source package hasn't pae enabled
Mac102250 you can press ctrl+alt+f1 to drop to tty1
!pae 
mfilipe, please see my private message
Oh
hum... ok
thanks
syntaur: i'd be surprised, but it's worth a look. we've run this away from AWS without issues like that... but who knows.
ubuntu has no pae?
can you upgrade from Ubuntu Beta 11.04 to official version?
atlgeorge: That's all I can think of. If firewall isn't interfering, and you can access it locally, but not remotely.
do you lose any data?
!final | cc11rocks
cc11rocks: If you install a development version of Ubuntu Natty and keep up with package updates, then you will be upgraded to the official release of 11.04 when it comes out. To make sure, type « sudo apt-get update && sudo apt-get dist-upgrade » in a console.
ubusammyn150 https://help.ubuntu.com/community/EnablingPAE
syntaur: worth a shot, thx, it'll take some code archaeology, unfortunately (not my code, of course)
ty
hey guys. i'm looking to install a 32 bit program (Guitar Pro 6) on 10.10 AMD64 with a wrapper. the only doc i found about this was really old: http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=24575 ...just wondering whether that information is still valid and/or whether anybody had a pointer to something more appropriate.
anyone knows how to default browser on ubuntu 11.04? I want to set it chrome as default as it was before the upgrade changed it to firefox? any command or setting?
cool
remove firefox
is that the only way?
i want to keep it just in case
not all works on chrome you know
Squall5668, taglass...You've both been tremendously helpful. Thank you.
to make vlc media player default, i had to remove all the media apps that came w/ it
Unable to capture audio and record in gnome-sound-recorder ver 2.31 Maverick 10.10
anytime Mac
can any one tell me how to take a game out of one ubuntu install and copy it to another? The other install has a version of the same game already
hey guys ..
had a question ..
anyone how to set default browser on 11.04
I have a problem with mounting USB drives. Ubuntu always used to automatically mount USB sticks when I plugged them in, but it suddenly isn't anymore. I have already checked the /automount-stuff key in gconfig and it is set to true. How should I proceed now to figure out what's wrong?
These other things also stopped working around the same time (maybe at the same time?): My deskop is stuck automatically setting "keep desktop organized by name" when I log in. Also, Nautilus is all of a sudden taking forever to open large folders, when it was virtually instant before.
is 11.04 a LTS ?
what is the name for 11.04?
ravi: no
cordoval_ natty narwal
natty
natty
anyone knows how to set default browser on natty?
rww_, any known bugs with 11.04?
ravi: yes
if going from 10.04 - 11.04
cordoval_ try "update-alternatives –config x-www-browser"
i had a similar problem with usb yesterday
ravi: 10.04 to 11.04 requires going through 10.10 first.
cordoval_ if should ask for a default browser
:(
7/topic
Unable to capture audio and record in gnome-sound-recorder ver 2.31 Maverick 10.10
updaterelatives
pl help
exit
why ?
why '?'
any1 tried 11.04 on a thinkpad?
cordoval_: Did you find any solutions?
i had trouble with 10.10
well yesterday when i was doing some stuff, my main HDD stopped showing up
on a lenovo
yes mount it manually and perhaps it can work after a reset, check permissions too
when i tried to set VLC media player as default, i kept getting error messages
update-alternatives -config x-www-browser
you asked how to change default browser didn't you? that command will ask for a browser to use at gnome gui tools
it was working and then just took a dump
I boot my computer, and get dumped to tty2. switching to tty7 shows that most things loaded (I think). I log in to tty2 and running startx gives me a segfault, and says that the server is aborting.
ravi : search for ramsrambo in ubuntu Forums under Dell
why dell ravibn
?
Unable to capture audio and record in gnome-sound-recorder ver 2.31 Maverick 10.10 Pl help
update-alternatives --config x-www-browser
sudo of course
i have a lenovo ..
yes, sorry
ravi : bcos I had few problems while installing on latitude
cordoval_: you might have to do gnome-www-browser as well
oh ..
not good
oh thanks
will check
i guess ill have to stick with 10.04 :(
i was so excited
tell us if that solves your problem
ravi don't
will I have to re-install after the release tomorrow?
as2000: no, you can upgrade
Any one Here : Unable to capture audio and record in gnome-sound-recorder ver 2.31 Maverick 10.10
give me a url
or suggest any other sound recorder
http://www.pastie.org
rww_, gonna get busy
I boot my computer, and get dumped to tty2. switching to tty7 shows that most things loaded (I think). I log in to tty2 and running startx gives me a segfault, and says that the server is aborting. How can I resolve the segfault and get a GUI running again?
i can upgrade without issues?
ahh still firefox pops up
rats!
hi everyone i have a question is there a filesystem like ntfs for linux that dont have file permissions blocking from use on other computers for me the ntfs driver seems to be slow
hi i was trying to find a graphics driver but cannot determin my actual hardware. this is what i get in lshw. http://pastebin.com/0ck07caE   is there any other option to find my exact hardware?
perhaps I need to restart
cordoval_ what was the command msg? any errors?
command msg for what?
hi
no errors
how many hours to ubuntu? :D
0 auto chrome
1 manual ff
brianous: it'll be released when it's done, not at a set time
2 manual chrome
what did you change it to?
based on what i've seen of the blendtech i'm pretty sure it'll blend
woops
to 2 and then now to 0
cordoval_: I'm not sure, but maybe you can pick chrome in the Preferred Applications gui?
sorry wrong tab
hcook: +1
oh I thought there was a countdown
where is that?
preferred
came to join the party
cordoval_: System Settings
hey guys. i'm looking to install a 32 bit program (Guitar Pro 6) on 10.10 AMD64 with a wrapper. the only doc i found about this was really old: http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=24575 ...just wondering whether that information is still valid and/or whether anybody had a pointer to something more appropriate.
how to get there, this is natty I don't know where things went
anyone knows when (hour) is natty launched ?
i code in java...how do you start jar files?
cordoval even though we don't support natty here, try searching :)
click on your name in the top right of screen
in windows all i have to do is double click it...
java -d classpath name.jar
just got it
!who
As you can see, this is a large channel. If you're speaking to someone in particular, please put their nickname in what you say (use !tab), or else messages get lost and it becomes confusing :)
err I'm sorry on the power button
had to search it the natty way
bottom entry
well thanks for that
give me http://www.pastie.org
ok now it is solved
thanks
nice
is there a specific channel to get support for errors? (specifically with ubuntu)
I like natty
cordoval_: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
sorry
glad it's fixxed, and thanks taglass, i have to stop being a CLI warrior :)
hi all, have an ubuntu box that keeps respawning basically tty1 seems to be crashing and constantly respawning anyone got any ideas Im flumoxed
how do i make an executable jar file? in windows it works but in Ubuntu it says it's not executable and that i need a script
do i have to use scripts?
cc11rocks: have you set the permissions?
Herbs, did you try booting in recovery mode?
permissions for?
hey everyone, i just set up ubuntu on my new lenovo thinkpad and the mouse is going crazy, i jumps all over the screen and I have to restart the laptop to fix it... what the heck can I do to fix this, i'm very new to ubuntu
Ubuntu?
oops forgot to mention thats when you try to login single user works fine
cc11rocks, sudo chmod +x /your/file
java?
cc11rocks: the jar file
I used to have indicators on 10.10 on the pannels how do I get them back? I had temperature sensors and my messages would popup or windows for me to select
cc11rocks: you need to change the permissions of the file to be executable
can i still have pannels?
cc11rocks, in termional of course
ryan_ try this https://help.ubuntu.com/community/SynapticsTouchpad
oh...so just right click it, properties *cuts off*
can i do it through the GUI?
Hey any1 knows how long till the 11.04 realse??
or terminol?
no Minimal
!countdown
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
!countdown
cc11rocks: java -jar <file>
doesn't work
:(
I know its the 28th but acording to what time zone ? :(
or javacc i think works
celthunder...and that makes it an executable jar?
I can be distracted in a content and forget about things I was doing, that is why I think panels were useful
sorry Squall5668 forgot to mention thats when trying to login when it tries to authenticate the user tty1 dies and respawns its an 8.04 server (not mine)
now with natty I can't keep track of other things
how to solve it?
cc11rocks: that wont make it executable, that will just run the jar from a command line
so i just have to jar it up in Ubuntu instead of Windows right?
dropbox icon running does not show either
skype does but hardly
Herbs: so, what about "recovery mode"
so how do i make it an exe jar?
Herbs: did you try it?
it's an exe in Windows
i thought Java was multi-platform
cc11rocks: are you talking about minecraft, by chance?
xD
it is
i don't have any OS specific things in my code
cc11rocks, did u not get the command i typed to u?
mincraft is?
a game?
cc11rocks: slimdoogi posted a solution earlier
chmod +x jarfile
sorry Squall5668 single user logins in fine the permissions on dev/tty1 look fine and the script in /etc/events.d/tty1 looks fine also
okay cool...so to be clear, BrumDart, that is the answer?
and then
java -jar /path/to/your/file.jar
i know the second part
also I can't zoom like i used to with the windows key
it used to zoom the whole desktop in and out
i make JARs through CLI in Windows
Herbs: you still haven't answered my question, Did you try booting in recovery mode? if you don't know how to, please ask me
and now that feature is gone!!!!!!!!!!!!11
rats!
sorry Squall5668 single user is recovery mode
cc11rocks: i always run jar files from the command line anyway, i've never tried just double clicking one from inside the file manager
i want to like natty, but not sure how to do some things
is there a tutorial on how to handle it better?
when is the ubuntu relase?
any natty tutorial?
well, i distribute to users
I get a message saying decompensation, I have installed an AMD Phenom AMD a motherboard ECS ELITEGROUP MCP61M-M3 and when I install Ubuntu gives me eror what does that mean? I have also installed a 1GB DDR3 memory ADATA brand, has a hard disk of 160 gb samsumg brand
is it at 12:am
cordoval_: There are some videos on youtube people have posted
they don't want to use CLI
xsinick_laptop: it's not at a set time
going to check now
thanks
cc11rocks: add a shebang to it? idk if that'd work or not
just an idea
will they be enough, I just wonder
shebang?
im using an irc client.
how to search "natty"?
what is that?
I require assistance. I boot my computer, and get dumped to tty2. switching to tty7 shows that most things loaded (I think). I log in to tty2 and running startx gives me a segfault, and says that the server is aborting. How can I resolve the segfault and get a GUI running again?
cc11rocks: #!/usr/bin/java -jar  at the top of the file
alpha 3?
cc11rocks: will the other users be running the jar on a windows or linux system?
sorry Squall5668 and I told you I tried single user and that works fine
both
where to download ubuntu 11.04 release ?????
probably wouldn't work as that's not even java but :/ i just run mine from the cli
sorry Squall5668 whats your experience no offence Im a 2nd line Linux engineer
cdoktor19: it's not out yet
rww_: it's exactly april 29th  like after 12 tonight would I be available as said on the site?
Spaz_Dynamic: have you checked /var/log/Xorg.0.log?
aw aw aw
add  "#!/usr/bin/java -jar" to the manifest file?
Herbs: mine is probably worse :)
xsinick_laptop: it'll be released sometime between now and when it stops being April 28th everywhere in the world.
cc11rocks: Try looking at http://standards.freedesktop.org/desktop-entry-spec/desktop-entry-spec-latest.html  You could make a clickable icon that way.
assuming it isn't delayed :3
are 28 April now
Think of the release date more as a guide than a statement of actual temporal certainty
April 28 for me in 4 hours
cc11rocks another solution would be to make a 2 line bash script that will launch the jar file
q slow write apology for speaking Spanish
que cosa?
como que apologies?
not familiar with bash script
!es
En la mayoría de canales de Ubuntu se habla sólo en inglés. Si busca ayuda en español o charlar entra en el canal #ubuntu-es. Escribe "/join #ubuntu-es" (sin comillas) y dale a enter.
ChogyDan: yeah, I don't know what to look for though. it points out the segfault near the bottom as well
similar to batch script? i know what it is
for me in an hour and it's 28th
just don't know for to code
I get lost with the differences in Ubuntu sometimes becaue Im so used to Red hat based distros
Spaz_Dynamic: is this a new install?
US eastern time is the time everyone runs on
ohhhh, i think they copy to all server in the world now
!countdown
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
gonna be alotof problems in the beginning for 11.04   
Ubuntu 11.04 is NOT online yet...
countdown
!countdown
doesn't work
ChogyDan: somewhat. I did install it yesterday, but I also set my graphics driver to proprietary and attempted to update to 11.04
xsinick_laptop: I know redhat releases are EST based.  I would assume Canonical are using GMT though?
Buenas noches..
ChogyDan: after the update though, i get this.
can anyone help filesystem with no permissions like ntfs but native linux
Alguien habla español ?
re how to play this video: video formats vob bup ifo - this is what I have. what do I do? There are lots of files instead of one AVI file. Normally I like to use VLC
Spaz_Dynamic: I suggest reinstalling
cc11rocks: please use #ubuntu-release-party for Ubuntu release-related comments ;)
|SonGoku|: /join #ubuntu-es
!es |SonGoku|
SonGoku|: En la mayoría de canales de Ubuntu se habla sólo en inglés. Si busca ayuda en español o charlar entra en el canal #ubuntu-es. Escribe "/join #ubuntu-es" (sin comillas) y dale a enter.
cc11rocks: i'll throw an example into a pastebin for you
thanks!!!!
!es |SonGoku|
tripelb: That's a dvd.
taglass. I downloaded it from the internet. it's all in a directory. what do I do to play it? thanks
thanks
ChogyDan: bah, really?
hi, can anyone point me where to find help adding postgresql support to my LAMP setup?
what's the address? or you'll give it to me in a minute
?
thanks for your help tomorrow, I have to leave my home, I was late luck at all
taglass, do I have to make an iso file out of it. I'm so ignorant.
timccc: tell VLC to open disc and point it to the directory you have
tripelb: ^^
timccc: sorry, mistab
rww_, thanks
Spaz_Dynamic: yeah.. it is the fastest solution
can some one tell me what version must i download i386 or amd64 my processor is Intel Core2Duo T6570 i read in cpu test its 64-bit processor
cc11rocks: http://pastebin.com/UXwtqWwi
cdoktor19: amd64
thanks BrumDart...how to PM?
though you can run either...no reason not to run 64 if you can
rww_: when you beeped me, my VLC paused
ChogyDan: Eh, alright. I have a separate /home partition, when installing, how do I make it so that it doesn't install a new one and uses the old one as my ~
how does that work?
anyone here familiar or is using duplicity for backups? how far has it scaled for you? would you use this in a enterprise environment?
!BrumDart Testing
ha
Spaz_Dynamic: setup the partitions and don't format /home?
even my processor not AMD based ?
rww_, wow I can do the same thing then with the iso file from the dvd I copied -- then destroyed the original so I cant read it. Oh my Ponyo will be saved.
cdoktor19, be warned though. i think flash isn't that great with 64 flavor yet
celthunder: alright, thanks. I've just never done it before so I wasn't 100% certain.
cdoktor19: yeah it's fin
temporarytao: flash works fine...just make a 32 bit chroot or use multilib
celthunder, i stand corrected
tripelb, loved that movie. good thing you saved it
how to make a 32 bit chroot ??? am newbie
how to make a 32 bit chroot or multilib which is the easy way,
cdoktor I would advise you learn what chroot does first
cdoktor19:  multilib is probably easier then unless you want to seperate 32 bit apps from 64 and since you don't seem to care...
oh
cdoktor19, that's a bit involved. probably best if you stick with 32 bit first, IMHO.
any issues on updating 10.10 64 -
can i install effects on natty?
sounds the youtube video had effects
was that compiz or some other?
 hi all, I have an 8.04 box (not mine) that is failing to login as tty1 is respawning whenever a user is being authenticated, /etc/events.d/tty1 looks ok script content and permissions /dev/tty1 also anyone got any ideas Im lost with this one
Spaz_Dynamic: just use manual partitioning, and make sure /home isn't formatted
how about copying pasting from the terminal with few keystrokes without having to do the ctrl+c +v thing?
ok i will fin some information about multilib and how to make a 32 bit chroot, are some one have a link to that page ?
cordoval_: I use middle click
I did think the ownerships of /bin/login were iffy but changing them on test boxes has no affect
anyone knows how to copy paste from the terminal to elsewhere? I highlight but then what?
my mouse has not middle click
or it does the wheel
?
but is that the way?
HI!
cordoval_: maybe with the wheel, or maybe emulated by pressing both at the same time
oh yeah it works
cordoval_: click both buttons at once
thanks
the wheel is hard though
but simpler
[ 3551.409037] pwrdown, 0x6(BIT6)=ff
[ 3551.514123] rtl819xSE:No more TX desc@6, ring->idx = 0,idx = 0, skblen = 0x2a
[ 3551.514131] rtl819xSE:No more TX desc@6, ring->idx = 0,idx = 0, skblen = 0x2a
[ 3551.625982] rtl819xSE:No more TX desc@6, ring->idx = 0,idx = 0, skblen = 0x2a
[ 3551.625989] rtl819xSE:No more TX desc@6, ring->idx = 0,idx = 0, skblen = 0x2a
[ 3553.415696] pwrdown, 0x6(BIT6)=ff
[ 3555.415823] pwrdown, 0x6(BIT6)=ff
cdoktor19: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
#ubuntu+1
anyone knows how to pastebinit but graphically or to specific service? from a browser or from other editor for instance?
i have that message, is that ok
pastebinit with the less clicks possible
any pitivi users in here?
cordoval_: what's wrong with the current behaviour?
too many clicks, for instance if I have to select some output from the terminal or a browser
I don't want to paste it into a document or open a browser page
but rather directly click and it saves the url on memory to paste
cordoval_: pastebinit doesn't involve clicks??
pastebinit is limited to terminal and sometimes i cannot pipe the output that i want
I have to save to document first then use the command
ok as you all cant help me with my questio which is fine btw, can anyone point me to a reference for a red hat admins guide to ubuntu servers
a lot of keystrokes
Herbs, huh? LOL!
cordoval_: example?
Herbs, missed your question
man pastebinit   
kellnola ubuntu bit like windows keep changing stuff lol
example?
dont you use pastebinit?
hello peeps
Herbs, oh my yes. It can be frustrating.
lols....peeps
php some command | pastebing does not work!
the whole init / upstart thing would be painful to an RHEL type
i like peeps
the mashmallow ones? ^^ me too! xD
kellnola basically Im a red hat based server admin and Ive been asked to look at an ubuntu server thats borked but theres a few differences in locations service names stuff like that
cordoval_: sometimes doing it like this works for me: pastebinit<(command etc etc)
Hello! ^_^
Herbs, LTS is for production. The regular distro is actually pretty bleeding edge
hmmm oh thanks ChogyDan, how to change provider, I want pastie.org rather
<3
/me does not have CTCP actions implemented yet :(
dunno
rats!
9/11 was an inside job
Herbs, what's the prob. exactly?
!ot | IHateNaggers
IHateNaggers: #ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
that works too
kellnola you cant get more bleeding edge than Fedora :D
:D
Quick question. Does anyone know how to get Gnome 3 for Ubuntu 11.04?
Herbs, yes but that is RPM ... ANATHEMA!
:)
hey
rats! need to change to pastie.org
cordoval_: sometimes doing it like this works for me: pastebinit<(command etc etc)	
so i was wondering if it is worth doing a reinstall tomorrow with official if i have beta 2 running right now?
!final
If you install a development version of Ubuntu Natty and keep up with package updates, then you will be upgraded to the official release of 11.04 when it comes out. To make sure, type « sudo apt-get update && sudo apt-get dist-upgrade » in a console.
kellnola its just the thinks like no chkconfig I need an ubuntu guide for red hat users :D
!fresh | Ketterer
Herbs you can install chkconfig but it doesn't work with everything
Ketterer, fresh install is always better
I know but this aint my box
and the problem is tty1 dies whenever you try to login
ya i should do fresh ehh thats what i figured ( i have never like upgrade) i used it back on like 6.10 
rats! can someone knows how to change provide for pastebinit?
to pastie.org or is it hardcoded?
thanks guys
have a goo night
rww_, everyone thinks new is betta     hehe      
Herbs, you can use update-rc.d
j
rats!
hiexpo: my 10.10 LTS is much faster :P
kellnola even if its using upstart for tty1 ?
10.10 LTS isn't real.
rcmaehl, i get boot at 34 secs    :)    and 10.10 is not lts     :)
^
udo update-rc.d -f daemon remove <- like chkconfig daemon off
arent all LTS .04
Herbs, yes but not all .04 are LTS
howcome numlock is on, though my keyboard indicator is off?
kellnola cool I will give it a go as they have alot of custom start up scripts
another day though Ive spent long enough
Hi there, ubuntu was taking unusually longer to load and I did a reset, right before the computer turned of I saw that the ubuntu screen came up, therefore everything was fine. However, after restarting it, it goes straight into bash.
Any suggestion?
renancoelho: any errors? is gdm running?
gdm? I am really new to ubuntu, although I love it. I am able to run commands and cd places..
new slack out
<renancoelho
didn't try, it said to put a command and when I did it, it would say it could not find it...
sorry Im a server admin with red hat based it might be init 5
whatever the run level for gui is
I had to boot into windows...
Herbs: init 5 is i thought X session init 3 is terminal
each one is gui?
init 1 single user and 2/6 reboot/shutdown (i think)
hey, how long until 11.04 is available for download?
init 1 is single user 3 is CLI 6 is reboot I think 5 is gui
I am a single user, will init 1 load single user with gui?
Herbs: yeah sounds right
what is the effect like mac minimizing and getting windows opened?
or just command line?
renancoelho: no
is that water effect?
i want to make a SSH shell for a friend. what settings do I enter for his username?
hi
how to set up the mac like effect? for windows?
like User ID or shell access... just /bin/sh?
gueriLLaPunK: whatever you want? just make sure he has a shell and preferably a home dir so he doesn't get thrown in /
how to set up the mac like effect? for windows?	
<renancoelho
anyone?
anyone know how to get 32-bit compatibiliy working again in natty?  i tried reinstalling it and that did not fix it
hi
anybody knows what time is the 11.04 coming out?
it is working on me
BC_: install the 32 bit libs?
how to set up the mac like effect? for windows
for windows on natty?
I want to know how to remove the "sudo" authority from the first (default) user in ubuntu ?
cordoval_: stop repeating...if someone knows they'll answer
Herbs: oh.. ok.. I will try init 5 then... if not I will log back to windows... Thanks!
snow_us: visudo
I couldn't find the name in /etc/sudoers !
sorry just wanted to repeat the effect that I saw on youtube natty demo
!natty | MandoJM
MandoJM: Natty Narwhal is the codename for Ubuntu 11.04, due April 28 2011. Help and support (only) in #ubuntu+1. Natty is beta and is not currently intended for production systems.
it had like mac windows dynamics
really nice
i wonder if that is compiz or not
or which values because mine seems too fast or it is not there
google it
The 11.04 will be on friday
what is the name of that effect?
rats!
how to google it without the name?
celthunder:  I couldn't find the name in /etc/sudoers !	
cats!
the 32 bit libs are already installed and were working up until a about a week ago more or less and then i started getting the wrong elf class errors after one of the updates
cordoval_: you mean the "genie" like effect when minimizing? that is a compiz effect, but i can't tell you the name of it at the moment (running kde)
apprentice3d: nope  11.04 later on Thursday
yes
genie effect
is called?
wow
snow_us: hmm...remove it from group wheel/sudo?
cordoval_: magic lamp
could someone please help me to resolve this issue: (iscsiadm: iscsid is not running. Could not start it up automatically using the startup command in /etc/iscsi/iscsid.start. Please check that the file exists or that your init scripts have started iscsid)
magic lamp thanks!
celthunder: what happens if there is no user that has sudo authority :))) ?
snow_us: you use su
it does not show up though, sometime I had to do?
sebsebseb: you're right - 28th is Thursday
there is no user called su
snow_us: if you don't set a root pw or forget to just login to single user mode and set one
snow_us: su is a command to switch user
http://www.omgubuntu.co.uk/2010/08/get-the-os-x-genie-effect-in-compiz-easily/
ok
apprentice3d: 28th is today in my time zone
any eta for release?
MadDecent: no set time, will be announced on the ubuntu-announce list and in #ubuntu-release-party
Sebsebseb: for me there are still less than 3 minutes :)
MadDecent: sometime on the 28th ^_^
for me less than 2
haha same here
AbuMaia: well nearly had five hours here of the 28th,  kind of sad that I don't feel tired though in a way, because I been awake quite  a lot of hours now
AbuMaia: wrong one
apprentice3d: see above
I think they should have put a countdown or something because my notebook is now clean and waiting for official 11.04
apprentice3d: no no count down, because no one knows for suer when it will be out yet
there was a countdown, only in days though
is there a way to show the text during boot? (natty beta 2.. for now :))
apprentice3d: all we know is it's coming out on the 28th in most time zones, some time
what time zone do they run on
rats! i followed instructions and got it messed up
PST MST CST or EST
I want to say Pacific
but I'm not sure
xkemix: There is no set time or timezone.
xkemix: It'll be released sometime between now and when it stops being April 18th everywhere on the planet.
sebsebseb: then I was right, it will be available on Friday (if the servers will survive)
28th
rww_: 18th ?
sebsebseb: I am falliable!
xkemix: I mean 28th, as AbuMaia said :)
well its 12:01am EST and no download
wait for the next hour lol
rats!
exit
Hi, I am the guy who the gui wouldn't load...
didn't work...
say's it cant find init/
then I tried to do exit, and it says the init is taited...
tainted
rww_, what's the differences in packages between the natty you can have now, and the natty that comes out later today?
semitones: The natty that comes out later today contains fixes for any last-minute bugs they find.
semitones: This actually happened in 10.10 and probably other releases, btw. I'm not being theoretical :)
<renancoelho
check the users path
rww_, bugfixes since the last freeze? how much time elapsed since then? :P
anyone on how to get the magic lamp rightly?
old instructions don't work
boots to bash...
check the users path how? sorry really new to this..
semitones: I haven't been paying attention to the release schedule this cycle, so I dunno how they're doing it. There's no RC this time, so I assume it's different somehow.
echo $PATH
Then what do I do with that?
rww_, huh, cool!
If I have an ISO of 10.10, but nothing to burn it to... Can I somehow get it to boot from it?
i'm attempting to re-install 10.04..previous install was exploited via remote connection..via landscape i'm assumeing
Ziber: do you have a flash memory stick?
Ziber: how about a usb?
create a start-up usb stick useing that iso
only works if your pc support booting from usb
renancoelho: no... i dont :( i know i could've.
and mine does.
rats! nothing on genie effect
<renancoelho
yes
??
Ziber: currently running windows, ubuntu, or something else?
quit
And you need to make sure that the bios is set to boot from the usb before the HDD
Ziber: http://www.ubuntu.com/desktop/get-ubuntu/download it shows step by step.
A guy in my college class ran into that today
Herbs: not sure. it would'nt let me cd to some of the folders...
I installed tasksel to install a LAMP server. But when i start up tasksel and chose LAMP it just closes. Could someone help me with this?
renancoelho: I have the ISO, I need a way to boot from it without... having anything to install it on.
Herbs: if it is, then what should I do?
try sudo
it doesn't work with out sudo
I did... wouldn't let me...
you may need to be root to access certain folders
Ziber: if you're currently running Windows, try Wubi
I'm not :(
what are you running?
doesn't let me sudo.
Ziber: What is currently on the computer?
Also, unrelated question, how can I set terminal to support UTF-8?
Jordan_U: Well, an older version of ubuntu because thats the only ubuntu CD I had.
Ziber: It should by default. What problem are you having?
I want 10.10
Ziber: What version?
define doesent let you sudo
Jordan_U: 8.04, iirc.
I love sudo, even works in scripts :D
Ziber: try just upgrading in place
Ziber: You can upgrade directly to 10.04, and from 10.04 upgrade to 10.10.
RRU but you have to give your password to those scripts
question for y'all: running 10.10 with wine 1.3, I installed the game Rift, everything works great except when game runs it's ~5 fps and all of the textures are black.  Any idea?  I've googled like a madman and can't figure it out.
Jordan_U: do-release-upgrade? just looks like it'll take forever.
Ziber: that or go buy a cd--take your pick
Herbs I know
keys and root ftw :D
Ziber: It will, especially with the mirrors being hit heavily by users upgrading to 11.04 (which will be released some time in the next 24 hours).
aight
Nothing happens when I sudo, usually asks for the password.. but here nothing.
Jordan_U: Coupled with the fact that I'm on a college network and the bw sucks here.
how to restablish a component if i have messed it up?
unistall and reinstall it?
My college has the major networking
Ziber: You can also boot from the 10.10 iso with it just stored on your hard drive. Though that's more difficult to do with 8.04's grub legacy it's still possible.
rats!
renancoelho: What are you tryint to do?
just boot the gui...
Jordan_U: How would I go about doing that?
renancoelho: You have a broken system?
<renancoelho
I turned of the comp while it was loading the gui and now it wont load...
how to boot the gui?
rats!
Herbs: not really.
sorry to ask but I work with some dim shits
renancoelho: What was it doing whtn you turned it off?
what name of party channel?
renancoelho: Installing something?
usr13: just loading the gui...
usr13: it was taking a bit longer than usual and I thought it got stuck..
renancoelho: What does it do now?  What screen are you left with when it's done bootingz?
renancoelho: Oh, it may have been doing fsck (file system check / repair).
bash.. i think.. it loads up a bunch of stuff and at the end it says no init could be found.
that aint good
yeahh i think so...
rats! it was just animation but i messed it up
wonder if I should uninstall and resintall compiz to resolve
<renancoelho
usr13: i did see fsck somewhere.
Herbs: it just says it can't.
Herbs: This has nothing to do with $PATH, his root filesystem wasn't mounted properly and he's at an initramfs / busybox shell.
renancoelho: Ok, well fsck run periodically to check and repair filesystem errors.
<renancoelho
Herbs: is that because I turned of while in fsck?
how to reestablished after compiz –replace &
<renancoelho
renancoelho: if it was performing filesystem ops, definitely
it might have been moved to lost+found
Herbs: The initramfs doesn't contain fsck.
so should I fsck? is that the command: fsck?
jordan and?
she turned the box off during an fsck
Herbs: And so he won't be able to "boot into single user mode and run fsck". fsck is on his root filesystem, which isn't mounting properly at boot.
rootfs doesent mount in single user
it mounts as ro
renancoelho: Boot a liveCD, run "sudo blkid", pastebin the output (using http://pastebin.ubuntu.com ) and then we can give you step by step directions from there.
booting from live CD should work if there is doubt
can it be from my usb?
The same I used to instal?
if your BIOS will check the usb and boot from it before checking HDD, then probably
new to ubuntu, im looking for software to download photos from my HP Photosmart R725
<renancoelho
sorry for my rudeness, hello
join #ubuntu-es
having a wireless issue. if anyone can help. I ran iwconfig and my eth0 shows no wireless extensions.
eth0 will thats your lan not wlan
Ok, I will boot from the usb and come back.... thanks!
hi
ahh.
-_-
oops. nvm. sry.
SkrappJaw: What wifi chip?
lol.
i have ordered cds before closing of shipit. and i got msg that cds are delivered to parcel company. but now shipit program closed. and i cannot see status of my order? help?
its a dlink
It had worked before.
its PCI
sandi:I dunno, Shotwell might. I have no idea honestly
ubu 10.10
SkrappJaw: What is the output of 'lspci|grep Network'?
SkrappJaw: what you want to do?
I cannot find any networks
gtkam came close but the model is not listed
im currently on a laptop. lspci|grep Network prints nothing
SkrappJaw: do you have a wireless router?
SkrappJaw: what networks you want find? more specific omg
yea. the laptop im on is on ubu 10.04 and is wireless. the desktop ubu10.10 is what im trying to get working again.
i have ordered cds before closing of shipit. and i got msg that cds are delivered to parcel company. but now shipit program closed. and i cannot see status of my order? help?
lspci | grep Ethernet
not network
! who | SkrappJaw
SkrappJaw: As you can see, this is a large channel. If you're speaking to someone in particular, please put their nickname in what you say (use !tab), or else messages get lost and it becomes confusing :)
SkrappJaw: you see wlan(number) in ifconfig -a ?
SkrappJaw: Are you sure the wifi card is enabled in the bios?
it should be wlan0 no?
Herbs: Yes
i know there are a few here. and my desk pc doesnt show any anymore. i cant even connect to the home one via connect to hidden network.
SkrappJaw: what is your "ifconfig -a" shows?
Ethernet Controller Realtek RTL8180L 802.11b
i need some help please
Thanks Sciguy, I'll keep looking
what am i looking for under ifconfig -a?
your ip address
i need  some help with a wireless realtek can anybody help??
hi all
I am trying to install ubuntu on my main pc and the walkthrough installer has stopped at the "Who are you?" step
how to add dns suffix in ubuntu
infact please run it and go back to windows
Herbs: no-one in their right mind would go back
:P
soreau why would the wifi be disabled in bios?
SkrappJaw: I don't know. Can you pastebin the output of 'lspci' to pastebin.ca?
how many hours should i wait to get the new release?
please help
how many hours should i wait to get the new release? who knows?
:-o
topramen: what do you have filled out on it so far?
ubottu is fetching the link!!!
Error: I am only a bot, please don't think I'm intelligent :)
every text box
physically_fit, ask in #ubuntu+1
nevermind
i feel dumb
!release
Ubuntu releases a new version every 6 months. Each version is supported for 18 months to 5 years. More info at https://wiki.ubuntu.com/Releases & http://wiki.ubuntu.com/TimeBasedReleases
Abhijit, i did. they don't answer
ok
yes that group is always dead
i have ordered cds before closing of shipit. and i got msg that cds are delivered to parcel company. but now shipit program closed. and i cannot see status of my order? help?
soreau: one moment.
what is the apt-get command to see what package contains a file
how do you know it is the same problem?
hmmm
crazy_pete, apt-cache search
the equivalent of "yum -provides */bin/proggie"
thanks Abhijit
i dont know if its equivalent of yum -provides
crazy_pete think you would need to use dpkg for that Im a red hat admin so not sure but try man dpkg
hi , how many hrs left for Natty Narwhal ?
yeah i know redhat not ubuntu
test ["yum -provides" -eq "apt-cache search"] :P
haha ashmew2 i want to know too!
and i want to do some video edting
lol RRU_Sciguy
was 10am last release
physically_fit : I just had to reinstall 10.10 because my hd crashed...that aint fair ! ...lol
physically_fit, ashmew2 ask in that #ubuntu-release-party channel
and i don't want to compile and build the 80 million packages needed to support multimedia on centos
thanks Abhijit
lol 80 million
abhijit:Thanks
but it looks like Ubuntu isn't "server man enough" to do what it needs and centos isn't "arty desktop man enough" to do it either
yeah thanks Abhijit
centos is a fine server platform
its a GREAT server platform
I know how to share folders from (at least) home directory onward, but how can I share protected folders such as /usr/bin, without severely compromising my system's security?
halt
well , /usr/bin if granted right access , anyone can put in a malicious executable
.
the only thing wrong with centos is the main branches are not updated nearly as frequently as they should be
write**
litropy set up an nfs share and make sure you only allow trusted servers in hosts.allow and make sure you deny :ALL in hosts.deny
but as long as your server works, who cares :-)
why is ubuntu 11.04 not out yet?
is there some delay?
haha buhman, you must be new
buhman: because it is not yet the 28th in n.america, I guess.
its always delayed a few hours
ayecee: sure it is
ayecee: 42 minutes in to the 28th
buhman: sure, on the east coast, but who lives on the east coast?
hmm
ayecee: and the CST will be the 28th in 18 minutes
its usually released sometime during the night (if you are in america)
they'd better hurry up
buhman: your math is irreproachable.
buhman: join #ubuntu-release-party
so just chill with us, and start making a list of all the cool natty customizations to do
they say
security through obscruity doesnt work
but
i change ssh port to random high port and attacks on my ssh went from 30 a day to ZERO
zero
lol obviously you have 22 open to the world your going to get attacked from every bot net out there
reves are you the real mark?
MasterUbuntu: the internet doesn't work that way.
ssh port should always be changed from default. bots usually wont waste the time scanning alts
yep
i doubt i'll ever have an attack again
no1 bothers to scan high ports
bah
Try not to have ports open to everything. And dynamic ports are more secure, but may be more of a hassle. I don't have enough experience to tell for sure
can anybody point me to some current information about running 32-bit binaries with a wrapper in 64-bit ubuntu? looking to make guitar pro 6 work but it's only available as an i386 .deb
if an admin changes the ssh port, chances are that admin added other layers of protection
hackers want to 22 noobs haha
apt-cache search "/.*/VBoxAdditions.*"  returns nada
thegreatdane it dont matter if they do just changing the default throws of the automated if anyone is targiting your box it dont matter what port you change it to if there determined to get in
where can i get the virtual box guest addons for ubuntu please?
yea but they've no reason to be determined
herbs, i think we should ask Sony about that
plenty of servers out there with ssh on 22
lol nuts
ssh on 22 is just so lazy
and all these script kiddies, only try to get in by ssh
read logs, ban ip addresses
i have fail2ban
fail2ban @ thegreatdane
im more worried about all the phpmyadmin hacks out there than ssh hacking
didnt hear about that
what do you mean, how can I reinstall natty?
well my server isn't running httpd
its only running openvpn
so actually the iptables only allows 2 ports to be open, one for ssh and one for openvpn
bye
yes the main threat for webservers these days are injections Id say
I have a problem
cordoval_: reinstall maverick. you wanted to downgrade, right?
locked down better than fort knox
ah, my server isnt running phpmyadmin . but those hacks are so nasty on all the wordpress and cms sites
i am trying to burn a data cd and it is not working
phpmyadmin was a bit of a silly idea in the first place
uhh
its apr 28
wheres my ubuntu
Try monitor settings
ls_: get in line.
there is not a set hour it comes out. it does not release at 12 am. it could be any time on the 28th.
ls, as always.. ubuntu is never released at the strike of midnight
ls_: try #ubuntu-release-party for breaking news.
My cd burner is not working....i try to burn pictures and it won't burn them
gogervibe4g 
i'm hungry
hello
?
madhu: feel free to ask a question
hi maco
and not question-mark us
gday
im in canada
its the 28th
is ubuntu coming out any moment now?
how to mention suffix name in ubuntu
juzzy_:  Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol. also, natty discussion goes in #ubuntu+1 and the party is in #ubuntu-release-party
thanks
hi maco
I have some friends who have been  in tokalau and they are still living in the 27th
 how to mention suffix name in ubuntu
can anybody point me to some current information about running 32-bit binaries with a wrapper in 64-bit ubuntu? looking to make guitar pro 6 work but it's only available as an i386 .deb
madhu: how do you mean?
hcook: I'd like to, but I'm afraid I'd have to google it myself.
in windows we add computer and dns suffix name right---- system.india.org
how to get this in ubuntu
hcook you need a chroot jail Im to tired to go into it though the easiest way would be a 32 bit VM but that wont work as you need graphics
computer name is called hostname, it works the same way
so if we have beta we just update on update mangaer?
system name is usually the suffix
ya hostname is ok
tenochslb: yes
how can i transfers file to my ubuntu to a laptop
useing windows xp
i need like this---  hostname.ubuntu.com
codex84: you can enable file sharing on ubuntu
madhu: where should that appear?
madhu: the hostname command or /etc/hostname
!natty
Natty Narwhal is the codename for Ubuntu 11.04, due April 28 2011. Help and support (only) in #ubuntu+1. Natty is beta and is not currently intended for production systems.
madhu first you need to be owner of ubuntu.com
madhu /etc/hosts
!party
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
omg im banned from u-r-p
ashmew2, /msg ubottu
ayecee: Herbs: all i could find googling was this really old (2005/hoary) forum howto....is that still about how it works?
http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=24575
bazhang: what to msg ?
in /etc/hostname it is showing only the hostname not the suffix name
hola bazhang
ashmew2, no need to create so much noise in the channel
codex84: the easy way is to find the folder you want to share, right click and go to Sharing Options, then allow users to create files there. then on windows, look for the computer in your neighborhood
I have a Kensington Orbit Optical trackball. As you can see: (http://tinyurl.com/6btnlhv), it doesn't have a scroll wheel. While using supported operating systems, right-click+leftclick'ing tells the OS to scroll with the ball's y-axis until another click happens. How can I attain the same functionality in Ubuntu?
bazhang: can u unban me now ?
wait for upgarde :)
11.04 released?
in redhat we had this---http://www.centos.org/docs/5/html/CDS/ag/8.0/Configuring_Directory_Databases-Creating_and_Maintaining_Suffixes.html
yes... in Colombia 12:03
waiting .... :(
hcook depends what you need to do thats a whole ubuntu 32 bit chroot
hcook: that should work. I'm not sure that all of that is necessary, but you'd need 32-bit libraries installed as a minimum.
codex84: this requires your windows xp machine, and your ubuntu machine, to be on the same LAN
Hi.  I'm new here so I do know what I am doing yet.
is 11.04 released in India?
codex84: do you understand?
Guest74426: it's often a good idea to watch for awhile to get a feel for what's going on here.
vibhav: no
hi lapion
Can anyone help me with a problem?
do you know when?
Guest74426: only if you describe the problem
cant wait natty release
11.04 release in usa ??
vibhav: some time on the 28th
Guest74426: depends on the problem
!party | yuskhanzab
yuskhanzab: Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
i have an issue trying to enable wireless on my Lenovo B560.  Each time I Fn-F5, my Ubuntu 11.04 hung.
ayecce : You too are from India?
!party
vibhav: no, I do not have that privilege
oh!
Great here it is.  When I installed Ubuntu 10.1 with my windows xp, I found that it installed two versions.  How do I get rid of one version?
ANY INDIAN HERE?
is 11.04 released or coming tommorow?
hi madhu
anyone know if natty is out?
ANY INDIAN HERE?
!caps | vibhav
vibhav: PLEASE DON'T SHOUT! We can read lowercase too.
vibhav, in #ubuntu-in
natty isn't out yet
any idea what /var/log/lastlog is for?
isn't is 28th in SA yet?
ok!
sorry
 Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol. also, natty discussion goes in #ubuntu+1 and the party is in #ubuntu-release-party
theGreatDane: records the last login time for users :)
last login use last -f /var/log/lastlog to view
theGreatDane: used by the "last" program, for instance.
#ubuntu+1
nishanth: /join
thanks
hey what time in UTC +10 is ubuntu scheduled to be released
theGreatDane, type the command lastlog and you find out ayecee
locodir-user: when it's ready
i don't know, is the announcement actually scheduled at a particular time?
tensorpudding: no
hi maco
tensorpudding: thanks im not sure
guys will i be able to install gnome shell 3 on ubuntu 11.04
BATMAN_: there's a PPA. also this channel isnt for 11.04
im using aide, and i set it to notify me about 'atime' changes, however it appears that opening a file doesn't change the atime
question, how do i properly remove a ppa from ubuntu? added that xmbc ppa and now its giving me all types of errors
bazhang: i know
if i open a file over winscp for example
sorry ... UTC +10. sure ... Australia
hi maco
nutsfornatty : refer to  http://bigbrovar.aoizora.org/index.php/2010/01/10/how-to-safely-remove-ppa-repository-from-ubuntu/
madhu: hello
3:09 PM - Thursday, April 28, 2011
madhu: is there a reason you keep highlighting me with nothing more than the word "hi"?
ty kindly @ vibhav
your welcome
how to get dns names, hostname.ubuntu.com
meh
ya
u r not responding so
are you really going to wait until the announcement before you stop telling people to join #ubuntu+1?
is it out yet
ls_: no
sorry wrong channel
madhu, you want to keep a database or simply have the current computer resolve the names correctly ?
lapion: nothing
yes
madhu: questions are to be answered by whomever can. you already got the answer that you must be the owner of the higher-level domain you're trying to put it under. you dont own ubuntu.com so you can't
tensorpudding: I imagine many people here have not yet used natty, so it'd be hard to support.
madhu : - use network tools in System -
that won't change tomorrow
hi indians
madhu: buy a domain name. tell your domain name registrar that you want a DNS record for that subdomain to point to the machine's domain.
tensorpudding: not overnight, no.
madhu, yes to which question
how to be the owner of *.com
you need to own the .com
how to copy files from terminal to cd on ubuntu
madhu: buy it
madhu: i buy my domain names from 123-reg.co.uk
is it out yet?
is it out yet?
isout1: no
test
isout1: no
test
isout1: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
test
and i doubt you are buying the ubuntu.com domain anytime soon so... gl
Not in India
!party | isout1
isout1: Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
how to create it
Does anyone know of a GUI based multimedia converter like mencoder?
madhu:just by the domain .com
test
before i buy
test
how to copy files from terminal to a dvd or cd..my ubuntu STOPPED WORKING
madhu: pay money to a domain name registrar
test
test
isout1: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
test
madhu: its usually about $10/year
madhu: domain names are bought, you need to find a registrar and pay them money
i had the domain name----- darkhorseboa.com
at repeated intervals
how to copy files from terminal to a dvd or cd..my ubuntu STOPPED WORKING..I need to backup my files..really in mess now
illmortal: dvdrip is a good front end for ripping dvds specifically, but I haven't seen a good one for general purpose video conversion.
it's like renting a storage unit
madhu, you need a local dns-server
mythri first what does pwd show
illmortal, handbrake
and the domain name you want has to not actually be used
ayecee I need one that convert MKVto avi
already
madhu, or bind
ok new problem
how to create a local dns server
illmortal: good luck with that
easy install bind and create the zone entries
bazhang, handbrake?
madhu: there's lots of documents out there for BIND 9 and djbdns
illmortal, yes
usr13, how to copy files from terminal to a dvd or cd..my ubuntu STOPPED WORKING..I need to backup my files..really in mess now
anyone have any experience installing Grub4Dos to a thumb drive/hard drive from Ubuntu? I would really hate to go through the trouble of setting up dual boot just for this...
madhu: which are the most popular DNS servers
What time does natty drop?
mythri cdrecord dev=/dev/hdc speed=24 driveropts=burnfree -dao -data /path/to/files
madhu, but you have a small amount of suffixes you should simple create a hosts file and distribute..
AustinWolfclaw, no one knows
ok
i installed ubuntu and it told me to restart when i did all it boots into is a blank black screen with a flashing underscore
i will check with bind9
ok I'll check it out right now.
well, most popular Linux ones, I'm sure the Microsoft one is terribly popular
ok
vibhav, all i can acess is my terminal and i m new to ubuntu..pls it would be greatful if u guide me through terminal
okkk
mythri type init 5
ya i installed bind9
or service gdm start
anyone?
Hello all
hmm, Microsoft's DNS server is a fork of BIND
Herbs, i need to backup all my files in ubuntu..to a cd..all i can acess is terminal on recovery mode
Glaceon: what's your question?
i installed ubuntu and it told me to restart when i did all it boots into is a blank black screen with a flashing underscore
Glaceon: yes, I saw that. what is your question?
mythri : ohhh
Hello everyone. Is there any information on detailed release schedule today?
hid3: no.
mythri : have you installed Windows?
whats going on ? why wont it boot???
oh wel...
wen i configured the named.conf.local
hid3:  Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
vibhav, yeah i have windows with me
Glaceon: hard to say. have you tried powering off and restarting?
vibhav,  i need to backup all my files in ubuntu..to a cd..all i can acess is terminal on recovery mode
yes
yeah, pretty informative ;-)
mythri : the files are on the ubuntu Drive or on the Windows Drive?
Glaceon: does anything appear on screen before it reaches that point?
it's April 28, can I upgrade now? or is it STILL beta?
does gnome-shell 1 provide ALT+TAB feature? Because in mine, it doesn't seem to work
vibhav, the files are on ubuntu drive
cbart: still beta until it's formally released.
mythri is the drive mounted rw?
cbart:  Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one thid3:  Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
vibhav, yeah i have windows with me
bah
On the Desktop?
vibhav: sorry i fail at copy paste
Herbs,  i dont know i m new to ubuntu
mythri type mount -o remount,rw /
so, later today
damn
my motherboard splash screen
oh i see it scrolled while i copied
i can't wait any longer!
maco : - On the Desktop?
cbart: quite likely, yes. join #ubuntu-release-party for breaking news.
maco : - The files are on the desktop?
vibhav: i copied what someone else said because the text scrolled while i was copying
vibhav, its in home folder
okk
vib in documets
maco : - Can you boot to Windows?
IS it safe to uninstall FGLRX?
vibhav: i dont have a windows box
Glaceon: hmm. without grub showing up, about all you could do is try installing again at this point.
grrr.....
hmm.. installed Handbrake-cli and it's not even in my applications menu. even tried opening it via terminal.. claims it doesn't exist.
vibhav: as i said twice already, saying that to you was the result of accidentally copying what someone ELSE said
vibhav, wat can i do now
illmortal: dpkg -L  packagename    <-- will list all files installed by the package
mythri : - Ill talk to you first and then to maco"
Guys, Does gnome-shell provide ALT+TAB feature? Because in mine, it doesn't seem to work... ANYBODY here have used gnome-shell?
vibhav: uh, im headed to bed dude. dunno why you need to talk to me
dpkg -L | grep packagenameyoursearchingfor
illmortal: might help to see what was actually installed. dpkg -L packagename will show what was actually installed.
Herbs: no
vibhav, ok
Bruce_Wayne: natty support is still in #ubuntu+1 at this time
Herbs: you give it the packagename directly and then can grep for a file within it
maco : - I thought you changed your name to maco.....oops.....lolz
so do we have a timeframe for tomorrow?
IanWizard-Mobile: Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
IanWizard-Mobile: not at this time. join #ubuntu-release-party for breaking news.
mythri : - Do you have windows installed?
maco ah ok cool
maco: that's unreasonably optimistic :)
you're right, stupid question
Hello everyone!
see you tomorrow. :)
ayecee: it's the standard line for the last 4 years, and it's held true ;-)
Any idea when Ubuntu will release?
uhm.. how do I open the HandBrakeCLI UI?
nashj: Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
--help doesn't give me much info.
vibhav, yea i have a windows installed
illmortal: cli would include it doesnt have a gui.....
illmortal, cli means command line interface, there is no gui
illmortal: erm, s/include/imply/
illmortal, you dont, its cli
maco, you have that in your clipboard don't you.
mythri : - Can you boot to Windows on your Compueter
IanWizard-Mobile: yes
maco: I'm pretty sure it's slipped a few days in some years, but I don't have an example offhand.
oh lawd.
mythri : - Can you boot to Windows on your Computer
release slipped two months once :3
illmortal, you want gtk
ayecee: 6.06 was moved by a few months, but that was decided a lot earlier than 24h before
good for you, we need someone to fend off annoying people like me.
maco: Yes, that is true, But any idea in how many more hours will the release be scheduled?
nashj, no
ya i need an interface... I tried using mencoder.. I can't access my external hard drive because it's named, "My Book" (with a space)
nashj: what is this "scheduled" of which you speak?
and I cannot rename my external HDD
Is the 11.04 release delayed? It's already almost the 28th in PST!?!
is it out yet??
nashj: it's ready when all the CDs come out not-broken
what1: no
illmortal, its handbrake-gtk
ok bazhang
illmortal: put a \ before the space, problem solved
maco: :) I mean around what time will Natty be release. Any idea?
nashj: when it's ready
what1 it's two hours until the 28th pst
really? ok.. let me check. so i would type My\ Book?
maco: lol! ok... thanks
nashj: i cannot predict the future to determine when the builds will work
nashj, no one knows stop asking
the ops should add 'no its not out yet' to the topic ;) not that it would help.
nashj: get me a crystal ball if you want a better answer!
nashj: better yet, join #ubuntu-release-party for breaking news
illmortal: yes
velcroshooz, the topic already addresses that
ok ^^
imortal you could change the label on the drive and remount it or just remount it to a mount point without spaces
or use "my book"
anyone knows what time Ubuntu 11.04 will be released
I'm wondering why I have plugins activated in firefox such as DivX Web Player, iTunes Application Detecter, QuickTime Plugin-in and Shockwave Flash. I was hoping and thought that they are not available to Ubuntu. Are they fake and wrapped to totem or vlc?
Genghiz: Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
Im really tempted to write this bash script to tell you lol]
Genghiz: breaking news in #ubuntu-release-party
maco that can be +- 12 hours
Genghiz: yep
Genghiz: actually i think its +13/-12
is the 11.04 torrent out yet?
Genghiz: there is a UTC+13 timezone after all
pp7_ : No
trh
fg
dfghdf
gfhd
gfh
gf
john__: Please don't flood; use http://paste.ubuntu.com to paste; don't use Enter as punctuation.
:(
maco,  :)
ok one last question.. the video is 720p HD quality... should the bitrate still stay @ 1200?
illmortal: that's a fairly technical question, and should probably be directed at a forum surrounding the converting application you're using.
ok
illmortal: I had thought that 1500 was typical for xvid encoding of movies, at least.
hm... interesting.. I'll test both 1200 and 1500 :)
thank you guys for assisting me.. that was fast and helpful :D
Is the 11.04 release delayed? It's already almost the 28th in PST!?!
is it out yet??
大家好！
my thoughts exactly
whomie: no
Whatamess: no
wthf
histo: already gone.
ahh
well it's not delayed it's just waitin
histo: I did the same thing, except that I read what I typed first :)
that person only stayed for a total of one minute :) Guess there's some people with really itchy hands
see ubuntu doesn't sleep it just lies in wait like chuck norris
ayecee: I type too fast to catch it
histo: you are the keyboard ninja :)
Is there a ubuntu channel for newb questions?
renshai: here
 /exit
O.o
its the 28th in europe.... GIVE 11.04
Nabbies: breaking news in #ubuntu-release-party
!countdown
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
ayecee, i reinstalled it and its still messing up
rensha ubuntu-beginners
!countdown
Glaceon: bad news. do you have more than one hard drive?
no why
Nabbies: Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
:)
Glaceon: because I've seen that happen when the bios and linux have different ideas about the hard drive order, and grub ends up installed on the wrong disk.
maco: could you add the release party channel in your copypasta? It would come off as more friendly.
I'm installing ubuntu via wubi, I would like to give the system 80GB but it will only let me give at the most 30.  How do I do this?
quit
exit
jslozier: try /exit
or /quit
proq: i haven't seen that before. is that a limit from wubi itself, for some reason?
ayecee: I can't imagine why.  I have 119 MB free and the system is only 2 days old so I'm sure it isn't fragmented
How to get Fingerprint Scanners Work in ubuntu?
are we able to download the 11.04 official release yet?
I guess that was 119GB free
anthony_2409: no. breaking news in #ubuntu-release-party
119GB free, yes
anthony_2409, you have to wait for 24 hours
at least!
why the delay in releasing 11.04?
new ubuntu is never released at midnight sharp
just wait, it will be released before the 29th
arun___: it isn't the 28th yet
arun___: if they were to release at 11:59 PM PST on the 28th, that would be in 25 hours
not that I'm saying that they said which time zone or hour
proq: and thats only UTC-8! (though itd be PDT right now so -7)... imagine in UTC-12!
yeah  :)
30 more potential hours
When is 11.04 released because I am kinda hoping to have it up and running today
Bob___: sometime before it stops being April 28th somewhere on the planet
happy ubuntu release eve!
Im In GMT
orBST
I'm installing ubuntu over my windows 7 netbook, happy day
Im not sure which
Bob___: before the 29th
Bob___: you could alwasy upgrade now and you will have it.
Bob___: release team is also in BST, so probably before they go to bed :)
what time is it right now in BST?
thanks alot
proq: 7am
maco: well it's 7am there
It is 1:54PM in china
why install over windows 7? windows 7 rocks
histo: that was the question, yes
its very good and stable
maco: Release manager's LP profile says America/Chicago timezone ;P
rww: they all fly to london
lol
maco: Ah. Curses!
maco: yeah right
theGreatDane, troll. (anything not bashing windows is trolling)
although that would explain the release time tendencies
maco: you read this in a book or just make it up as you go along?
theGreatDane: I'm more productive on ubuntu, for a variety of reasons  :)
histo: what? proq asked what time it is in britain *right now*
hey, how can I make all of my function keys perform their action without needing to have fn pressed? (i.e invert the fn button). thanks!
histo: a little fom column A, a little from column B
histo: so i rounded to the nearest hour... which is 7am. fine so its 6:55am technically, but close enough
argh
aroman: set keyboard shortcut preferences to what ever you want.
dc'ed
histo: though i have no idea why i'm doing the `date` command's job
maco: they dont' fly to london for a release just fyi
aroman, if you ever figure it out let me know. I want to kill HP so badly
histo: well then i'd lose the ability to use Fwhatever keys
histo: so pgraner did what? swam there?
aroman, I have gotten used to it overtime...
smw: its just lame though
histo: a few key people do go to london for it
i need two hands to do something i should be able to do effortlessly
aroman, apparently "no one uses the function keys"
anyone know that time natty is released?
>:
aroman, agreed
aroman: then not quite sure what you are trying to do?
BarbaraBush_: before its the 29th in the last timezone
BarbaraBush: before the 29th
BarbaraBush, when it happens, it happens
maco: the 28th here
"When it's done"
aroman: you can't have one key have two functions. You have to use a modifier like the Fn key
BarbaraBush_: its not the 28th in california yet
it is done, was done yesterday lol
histo: i want the modifier to be pressed all the time
and un-press when I actually press it
BarbaraBush: contrary to what your family believes the Bush's are not the centre of the universe :)
BarbaraBush_: nor in the very last timezone, which is utc-12. still got 30 hours before the 28th ends!
hehe im not in cali  :P
e.g,
There haven't been updates for a couple of days now 11.04 has been done.
i know i was making fun of the duke nukem thing
Narwhal: thats why im in EU :P
Just download the daily iso if you people want it so bad
so where do i go to gripe about usability?
histo: wrong, I got 40 packages updated earlier today
tanath: devs
histo: there've been respins of the ISOs going on and language pack rebuilds and stuff
if I hit f1 which both maximizes and toggles volume mute, I want mute to be _default_
I came up with a good idea to beet the fact that all the apt mirrors will be overloaded. I will setup an ec2 instance with apt-cacher and download from the ubuntu ec2 mirror. What are the chances the ec2 mirror will be overloaded?
histo, that a channel? :P
aroman: then change your keyboard shortcut preferences
beat*
i'll just DL a torrent lol
histo: like I said, then I lose the ability to ever call fullscreen with a hotkey
AustinWolfclaw, yeah, but you still can't install other packages
11.04 looks to be a bigger disappointment than i feared it would be
aroman: no you can assign that a different hotkey
I'm not on ubuntu...
aroman: but do what you want.
histo: hmmph
I'm on windoes, i'm DLing the ISO
ok so i have been trying for 5 days to get help in #lubuntu with setting up a composite manager
torrent for the win
this is a very simple task
err i mean i'm going to dl the iso torrent
I've got a question that doesn't pertain to when natty is coming out. Who wants to hear it?
tanath: you hvae to go passed it as i've stated but you'll see for yourself
!ask | Spaz_Dynamic
Spaz_Dynamic: Please don't ask to ask a question, simply ask the question (all on ONE line and in the channel, so that others can read and follow it easily). If anyone knows the answer they will most likely reply. :-)
maco: no, but regardless, that's a software setting in OS X
BarbaraBush_, actually, i like a number of things about gnome 3, except that it also does the maximize thing, and has eliminated applet support which i need
aroman: and in ubuntu...
maco: oh it is?
where?
histo, mhm. thx
any AustinWolfclaw can you see why torrent does not help? What they need is to have apt use torrents!
aroman: yeah, we have a way to handle mac keyboards. lemme look it up again
smw: It's called humor. Everyone is asking about natty. =P
maco: oh right, that actually makes some sense
smw: I think there's an "apt-torrent" package that does that.
I happen to have a mac with a mac keyboard.
#ubuntu-release-party would be more appropriate rather than here
Spaz_Dynamic, ok, not very funny though... I was kind of excited
Narwhals narwhals swimming in the ocean, causing a commotion, cuz they're pretty awesome
ayecee, but it is not in general use...
smw: and techinically, I didn't ask to ask a qustion, or ask who knew the answer, I asked who wanted to hear a question that wasn't "when is natty coming out"
Spaz_Dynamic, ok
actually
how many computers all over the world are now running ubuntu
12.
smw: maco: I think I can actually do this manually in Keyboard shortcuts
!ot | Spaz_Dynamic ouyes
Spaz_Dynamic ouyes: #ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
not enough to get Adobe to port photoshop
42
ouyes, this can't be determined
Gimp FTW for Linux
aroman: echo 0 
what kinds of things can i do to make 10.10 run better on lesser hardware?
!ot 
Soon Gnome is gone
AustinWolfclaw, please see my private message
coldfish, that's your answer for everything ;0
granted i'd lose the normal Fkey function, but I can reassign most of the normal stuff
aroman, if you do it, let me know!
aroman: oh actually 1, not 0
* ;)
maco: whoa, trying that now, thanks a ton
aroman: http://superuser.com/questions/79822/how-to-swap-the-fn-use-of-function-keys-on-al-apple-keyboard-in-linux
i spent yesterday using gimp, its growing on me
kaatta: you could try using a different gui. Something like xfce or xubuntu etc...
smw: haha, alright. So, I'm wanting to make a bootable USB for ubuntu, kubuntu, and xubuntu. Is it possible to make one stick bootable for all 3 live "CDs" It is 8GB so there is more than enough room.
tanath, haha,right and simple one :)
If I'm on 10.10 is it possible to upgrade to 11.04 yet, or are thtose packages not out yet?
kaatta: there is help.ubuntu.com has low memory systems options
nutsfornatty, ive used gimp and photoshop, i prefer gimp by alot, ii just dont like a few bugs ive run into that have cost me 8 hrs of work
Roasted: they are out
aroman: dunno if thatll work on a non-apple keyboard though. experiment time i guess
histo, appreciate it bro
histo: I wasn't off topic, I was just using an interesting segue. =P
smw, just a aproxisimite number like 10 100 1000 1000,000
!ot | Barbarabush
Barbarabush: #ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
maco: it won't, the module isn't loaded. but I guess I could digaround and see if I could modprobe it somehow
ive tried xubuntu, and lubuntu, and had high hopes for lubuntu but lxde seems to be lacking too much that im used to with ubuntu
perhaps not interesting so much as long and slightly convoluted.
!ot rww
how do i open 'modules' ?
histo, by chance if you upgrade, do you know offhand how much extra hard drive space it uses? I ask because I only have 2gb left on my root partiion. I dont want to attempt it if itll tank it :(
Spaz_Dynamic, you might have a look at startup disk creator... dunno if it supports multiple though
ouyes, one googol (10^100)
^Phantom^: what are you trying to do exactly?
!ot | rww
rww: #ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
Spaz_Dynamic, I would say not. If I really wanted to put work into it, I would get the alternative install cds and combine them
kaatta: I have not tried it but many swear by lubuntu:  http://lubuntu.net/
see if i have !snd-pcm-oss in modules
smw, how would I do that then?
for a friend
kaatta, i think the basic gui is much better in gimp. photoshop is a bloated mess. tasks dont "flow" intuitively
^Phantom^: well you can lsmod | grep snd-pcm  to see if it's running. If not try locate snd-pcm-oss
nutsfornatty, gimp needs a lot of gui improvements though
Andre_Gondim, im on lubuntu now, i have been sitting in #lubuntu for 5 days asking for help getting a composite manager running (google is no help at all)
nutsfornatty, like 3 overlapping windows? >.<
Spaz_Dynamic, I know very little about ubuntu's usb thing. Does it run a iso in loopback?
^Phantom^: and I believe it's snd_pcm_oss
nutsfornatty, the biggest issue i have with gimp, is on really large projects, the 'undo history' gets so long tthat it will freeze and crash in windows
tanath, true. i could see it being the pixelmator (on osx) type killer app for ubuntu with some refinement
kaatta: What did you miss?
kaatta, there's also the ubuntu forums and askubuntu.com
nutsfornatty, i havent really used it in linux yet
why isn't mangler in the Ubuntu repos.
smw, I get a number for accessing ubuntuforums  4581000 ips per day
Spaz_Dynamic, for combining them, you get the alternative install cds, you look at the "pool" directory, and you combine them (they have the same file structure, some files are the same)
smw: I don't know that myself. I know that the utility unetbootin uses 7zip to extract the images and then makes a modification to the MBR it
Why isn't ubuntu out yet!
i dont mind the windows. no worse than adobes floating bars
?
andrew_46, i cant find a composite manager that works properly for things like an app dock, and conky
hfx: because it's not
hfx: ubuntu has been out for years. =P
when 11.04 release
hfx, #ubuntu-release-party
Yes, thats what i mean
econnell: I agree with your stance.
histo: no... i've deleted my ppa because i don't want to maintain it and since i've provided debs, no one else has really cared
now that i'm not providing those, you're going to get complaints
nsmnmj: Are you installing via dpkg or apt ?
dpkg
econnell: then maybe nobody wants the app?
nsmnmj: What package?
econnell: it's a user based distro
histo: yeah... that's what it is...
econnell: community based distro
gtk
ubuntu users are the majority of our userbase
econnell: then one of them will make a ppa and produce a deb i'm sure.
econnell: if you dont want to maintain it, did you at least file a needs-packaging bug in ubuntu or (better) a work-needing bug in debian?
are you serious?  do you even know what this app is and why ubuntu would be the primary userbase?
econnell: ventrillo client or something right?
maco: there's been a needs packaging bug for over a year
nsmnmj: Did you downmoad gtk?
econnell: i for one have not the slightest idea what app you are talking about
yes
from gtk.org
when new Ubuntu version will released?
all packages
(i also probably dont care if im getting on fine without it)
!part 
wieldy_NIOS: today
!part 
!party 
wieldy_BIOS, please see my private message
heh
!party
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
hell... look at our forums... we get messages like this constantly: I am giving Ubuntu 10.10 a test run on my main gaming rig (loving it so far ^.^) and i recently found Mangler which solved my biggest issue of not having a native ventrilo client for linux. I was astonished when i found out that there is a built-in applet for my Logitech G15 keyboard!
I was just about to ask his question, heh, oh well
ok-ok
econnell: I understand your complaint but that's how ever distro works
econnell: but really the bit about "they'll take on their own responsibility" ... the majority of ubuntu devs are volunteers taking care of the packages they care about and ignoring others. the ones being forced to take care of certain packages for their job are in the minority and since your software isnt part of the default install, they won't be forced to touch it at all
i dont' care how the distro works
econnell: okay
maco: wtf... seriously?  do you want to take a second to amend that comment before i respond?
econnell: we're just trying to explain
hi. I am on 10.10
!hi | sobersabre
econnell: not particularly. nobody except the canonical employees are REQUIRED to do anythng for ubuntu
do you think i make any money from this?  do you think i have some personal gain to make?
econnell: fame?
econnell: dunno
econnell: you and every other linux dev
I want to change default resolution of the console. tried messing with grub2, but it has no effect. I think I need to do something related to fb, but I don't know how with grub2.
I added gfxpayload=1024x768x16
is the new 11.04 due out today? i just checked the website and its still 10.10?
econnell: im just saying, nobody in particular has any responsibility to anyone else when it comes to what they package, unless its their *job*. its volunteer work. people can CHOOSE to take it or live it
sobersabre: add a vga mode to
DirtyDawg: some time later today
i've got projects way more important than this retarded project...  my fame for this crap will never be important
ahh thx
histo: ok. trying... will be back.
econnell: please don't use offensive language
vbeinfo is supposed to print out the vga modes list ?
histo: the above line was for you :)
sorry
econnell: then perhaps the project needs to be picked up by someone else. That's how linux works I don't know what you want.
sobersabre: here let me get you link you need something like vga=771
crap is considered offensive language?
econnell: by the way, ive scrolled back pretty far in the backlog to as far back as i can see you first talking, and i dont actually see you ever saying what software it is you want someone to package, so i guess i wont be picking it up as my next upload
i just want someone to package it so i don't have to spend an entire weekend building packages for debian based systems... that's all
nsmnmj: Gtk.org do not load, but it is not easy (or sane) to override version.
econnell: I would put a message on your forums asking for such
histo: I ran vbeinfo in grub shell.
there was no "771" in it
histo, econnell: and for that matter, just ask that it be packaged for *debian* -- no reason to package for debian and ubuntu separately. if its in debian, it'll be sync'd to ubuntu automatically
I wrote down and it looks like 0x117 (which would translate into 279)
whatever "it" is (i still don't know)
sobersabre: That means you cannot use 771
qin: so can I use the hex. codes from vbeinfo output ?
x3464: it was comparison to the mentally disabled that was offensive
sobersabre: sorry just saw you are using grub2 read post#17 here http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?p=8024427
histo: thanks, there.
while I boot my ubuntu 10.10 I get a *underscore* blinking for about 4 seconds, is there any way to replace it by ubuntu boot screen?
maco:  how about redonkulous then.
x3464: there were other words used
x3464: scrollback
sobersabre: ok, either: setupcon, or use this (very good) how to: http://idyllictux.wordpress.com/2010/04/26/lucidubuntu-10-04-high-resolution-plymouth-virtual-terminal-for-atinvidia-cards-with-proprietaryrestricted-driver/ (it is about old problem, but usable).
histo: ya know... a good portion of my users are blind... and they use an ubuntu deriviative called vinux, which is a derivative of ubuntu for blind users.   We have worked with them extensively within our app to make sure they had accessibility.  All the while, we were able to maintain casual conversation and even *heaven forbid* make jokes about blindness...  do you really take yourself that serious?
econnell: nope just don't understand what you want? or what your question is? perhaps there is a miss comunication
econnell: i still dont know what your software is, but i will say "thank you for actually bothering with accessibility, unlike just about everyone else"
econnell: I'm just trying to help and explain why it is the way it is.
maco: a ventrillo client. It's a voice chatting app.
econnell: i learned a few weeks ago that 10.10 wasnt installable at all if you're blind and 11.04 is only slightly installable
hi everyone... can anyone suggest a walkthrough or guide to help take necessary steps to secure my ubuntu install.  Just want to make sure I am making my install the most secure I can make it..
join #c
maco: histo: incidentlally... vinux includes mangler by default.... because it's useful
econnell: is that the name of the software?
tuckaway: is it just a default install?
maco: mangler
vinux is the name of the OS
http://vinuxproject.org/
hi there
hallo
econnell: yeah i know about vinux. ubuntu-accessibility team works with them. im asking "is mangler the name of the software you've been ranting about for the last half hour without naming it?"
tuckaway, is it just a simple desktop install? There is little to secure.
Histo -
tuckaway: secure it from?
lock it down!
maco: i've name it, linked it, linked revu posts, linked debian bugs...  fine... here: http://www.mangler.org/
tuckaway, what do you mean "secure". What types of attacks are you afraid of?
econnell: thanks. like i said earlier, i scrolled back as far as i saw you talking, and the earliest i see is you telling qin that you deleted....something.. and then just usng "it" to refer to the software so...
just want to make sure i am not leaving anything open on the machine by default.... file sharing, ssh, things of that nature...
tuckaway, what would you do to "secure" windows? What types of attacks do you fear?
i installed an ubuntu server 10.04 a few days ago and i'm stocked with an pci express ethernet card with realtek chipset r8168 somebody could help me ?
tuckaway: well if you don't enable them then no.
maco: i'm frustrated by debian/ubuntu... i shouldn't take it out on you
tuckaway, those are not run by default
tuckaway, I don't even think those are installed by default
tuckaway: just normal things to do: don't install stuff you don't need, don't run stuff you needn't, check running services if they are configured as restrictive as possible and "use /dev/brain"
econnell: well i am an ubuntu dev, but in general we prefer *not* to add new packages just to ubuntu, rather they go through debian so A) more users get it and B) more hands to help
llutz_: most people set up /dev/brain 
 graph
proq: common mistake :(
tuckaway, if you were making a kiosk or something where you are afraid of people with physical access, there is alot to do.
alright maybe i am looking to much into this...
just 2 years into linux and learning
tuckaway, yes, probably. For public computers, it is way to easy to gain root if you have physical access.
hello
hallo
:)
so what time will the official release happen today ?
tuckaway, so a school, internet kiosk, etc, would need some work.
lwizardl: there is no set time
 thanks smw
well... I am sorry for this question... but I read a lot of FAQs and... I couldn't solve my instalation's problem
any1 know what xinetd is?
its a process running on my box\
lwizardl, "Ubuntu 11.04 release is scheduled somewhere in the time period when it's April 28th somewhere in the world, not at a specific time"
may I ask for some help about how to install ubunto for netbook?
rww, can I have that as a bot cmd?
that would be sweet :-)
theGreatDane: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Xinetd
where is conicals "home country" ?
lapion: Isle of Man
lapion: bah not you
smw: and now you know why we restrict editing factoids :)
lwizardl: Isle of Man
lwizardl: though their office is in london
ok
tsimpson, yep. Still you have got to admit that would be a nice factoid :-P
ty
:)
smw: for one day, not really...
Tax Haven what?
tsimpson, fine, I will keep it in my clipboard
smw: most clients will let you set command aliases, set one to send that message
??? nobody to help?
Popopo: you havent asked a question
Popopo: what's your problem?
!details | Popopo
Popopo: Please give us full details. For example: "I have a problem with ..., I'm running Ubuntu version .... When I try to do ..., I get the following output: ..., but I expected it to do ..."
Popopo: or at least not a question beyond "can i ask a question?" level
you are right maco... but I explained it
my problem
is...
I am installing ubunto in my netbook
where already I have installed W7
and it has 4 partitions already...
I have no options in ubunto to installing with win7
That's something W7 does, recovery partitions etc
only erase all the disk
or manually
yes
I know Walther
but my question... Have I another option?
I mean... I don't want to delete my partitions because my job
would it be safe if  I remove quiet and splash from GRUB_CMDLINE_LINUX_DEFAULT="quiet splash nomodeset video=uvesafb:mode_option=1280x1024-24,mtrr=3,scroll=ywrap"
Popopo: i think you need to use manual since once there are 4 primary partitions, you cant fit any more at all. you need to get rid of a primary and put in an extended, then you can put lots in the extended one
Popopo: possibly one of these is already extended, even
I want Ubuntu boot menu instead of the blinking *underscore*
got it maco... it is not a bad idea
Popopo: but the 4-primary-max is just plain a hard drive thing, not an ubuntu thing
... I think more than one is extended... but isntalations system don't allow me to install it
maco... in anycase... if I put one as extended... if do I format the primary upper this extended... the extended will be formated too?
Official release out yet?
Hi, does anyone here have information about where I can get release version of 11.04?
Will 11.04 beta2 be upgradable to the official release?
its due out later today
msb___: yes
Yes
thanks
of course it is upgradeable, but i'd still recommend a clean install
silvery: not out yet, release manager will announce at some time today
i've been through so much trouble after failed upgrades
anyone have an estimate of what time it'll be out?
can't wait)))
quick_nick : thank you
UBUNTU COMES TODAY !°!!
i,m waiting to download it, have to say tho, i am not sure about Unity yet, looks weird
yeah, considering a clean install...
but guys
!ot
...
hello
I can't consider a clear install... too much information very important... and moreover... I need to work with win7 because university and job
Popopo: go with the manual partitioning, merge some partitions and make space for ubuntu
i have a dumb question about mounting a file system. I've mounted this drive many times before but i just installed ubuntu server and i can't remember the file system type nor how to properly edit fstab. any help pointing me to a howto/tutorial?
i just made a 100GB partition in preperation for the new release, i think i may wubi it first tho just to check it out
where to put auto commands in Xchat?
vibhav, it is under the server configuration
ok WaltherFi... got it... but it doesn't work. I tried already and doesn't work because I have already 4 primary partitions
where smw?
When does 11.04 go live?
pdg1: "sudo blkid" gives you the filesystem-type, man mount / man fstab should help to get a working fstab-line
vibhav, server -
on a side note, i wonder why wubi only allows a 30gb max size during setup
vibhav, it is the "connect command"
When does Ubuntu 11.04 go live?
Thanks!
DirtyDawg: wubi is not recommended
ScottONanski1: there is no set time
ScottONanski1: today
well... maybe next question is easier... for community... I have ubunto in a usb-key. Now I am running it in my netbook. I have internet connection... and I am trying to install aircrack-ng suite there... but I can't not... it say "dependency is no satisfiable:iw" What is happening?
hej
Hi everyone!
Popopo: aircrack-ng is not officially supported
Popopo: for that, ask some other channel
oh geez... i know what i'm doing wrong :p i forgot the 1 in sdc1
thanks llutz
mmm got it
ok ok...
WaltherFI: well i have 10.10 proper install on the desktop, putting the new release on my lappy
I will try install ubunto by your advices...
DirtyDawg: wubi often breaks after some use, it is not intended for long-term usage
there is another release? yesterday I downloaded the last one... it was not 10.10?
ahh
Popopo: 11.04 releases today
i totally advice for installing alongside
hi
im a nice guy
congratulations
thanks
!offtopic
#ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
uuuh today... for netbook version too? I will check it right now... maybe I have a solution there....
histo: I've tried your link, and implemented.
thank you for all the answers .ç:) I will try to continue from this point.
have a nice day!!! :)
As of now during the boot - GRUB2 does set the graphic mode correctly. BUT after that somehow the setup changes to something I don't want.
sobersabre: Try sys>prefs>monitors
Please advice on how do I change Unity to Gnome and would Desktop version of 11.04 have Unity as default desktop environment too?
launch party channel name ?
Soothsayer: #ubuntu-release-party
silvery: yes it would, but I read the switch is easy.. you just pick gnome during the login screen.
thanks
silvery: Also, natty is still not supported here until after the official release
Soothsayer : oh, thanks
Can anybody help me in streaming on my network which has 2 ubuntu boxes?
soreau : until today, then
what do the guys in #ubuntu+1 do when the new release is live? just idle and stay silent for a couple of months?
soreau: professor, isn't that a few hours away? :-P
Soothsayer: yes
silvery: Until -later- today
Can anybody help me in streaming on my network which has 2 ubuntu boxes?
DirtyDawg, then they can stop splitting their attention and just help in #ubuntu
ahh
soreau: sorry to be rude.   do you know what I am talking about ?
vibhav, stream what?
stream media like videos
sobersabre: What graphics card do you have?
soreau: are you a bot ?
smw : stream media like videos
soreau : thanks for your explanation
soreau: I'm trying to reconfigure console resolution.
Hello all
sobersabre: What graphics card do you have?
soreau: intel
sobersabre, as in when it is not running in the gui?
hey smw i want to stream Videos
smw: aye.
sobersabre: Have you tried the applet in system>preferences>Monitors?
I've been given a VPS with almost no information about it and told "migrate to this." As a first step, I did 'apt-get update && apt-get upgrade' and it tried to install grub. I told it not to. What are the chances that I screwed things up?
sobersabre, that needs to be fixed in grub
hey smw i want to stream Videos
sobersabre, add the option vga=??? where ??? is a 3 digit number representing your display
smw: I have yet to change vga=xxx, which I will try now.
vibhav, I know littel about that
smw thats fine
smw never mind
sobersabre, that is the only way I know how and I have done it many times
I tried gfxmode, gfxpayload but it apparently changed only what was happening in grub menu.
OK. trying now.
thanks.
how many hours till i can download natty?
<sobersabre
smw: I don't think vga=xxx is supported with kms
horse_play - by tomorrow
horse_play, "Ubuntu 11.04 release is scheduled somewhere in the time period when it's April 28th somewhere in the world, not at a specific time."
#ubuntu-release-party
vibhav: to get to a resolution I want in the console.
K_45, but its the 28th already?
smw: You use video=1280x1024@60
<sobersabr
soreau, um, it has always worked for me...
smw: are you on grub2 ?
smw: worksforme doesn't hold much weight
horse_play, read my quote
horse_play - timezone differences and the serves need to be updated
<sobersabr
<sobersabre
sobersabre, yes
soreau: preferences->monitors doesn't hold in console :)
sobersabre: Right, I misunderstood you in the first place
proq: in what context.
smw, K_45 ok thanks
soreau, yours looked better anyways
soreau, much better than a random 3 digit number
sobersabre: you don't see the context?
sobersabre: Basically what you're seeing is when the intel module is loaded with kms
sobersabre: <EbanSoul
proq, lmao
i heard that X is to be replaced by Wayland, is that right?
sobersabre: For example you would use something like this as a kernel param: video=VGA-1:800x600
@ DirtyDawg, eventually
:o
DirtyDawg, one day. X must die
:(
sobersabre: But the name VGA-1 may be different
<sobersabre
@ smv - legacy needs to go
soreau: I don't know where does VGA-1 come from.
<sobersabre
vibhav: to do what ?
<sobersabre
and what do you mean "easier" it is easy anyway: edit a text file, and run update-grub.
<sobersabre
vibhav: to change reso of console ?
sobersabre: I'm trying to find it now..
soreau: hint would be nice :)
<sobersabre
I like your eagerness to help. initially I thought you're not listening.
my bad.
Should a VPS install grup? I did apt-get upgrade and it tried to install grub
vibhav: not resolution of GRUB
I didn't think grub was installed before.
of console.
*grub
vibhav: ok ?
<sobersabre
josephoenix: usually no need for a boot-manager on a vps
vibhav: what irc client are you using? (I know I can /whois you, I prefer asking)
<sobersabre
has anyone seen this before? "(initramfs) Can not mount /dev/loop0 (/cdrom/casper/filesystem.squashfs) on //filesystem.squashfs"
<sobersabre
vibhav: what irc client are you using? (I know I can /whois you, I prefer asking)
hell, I got lagged over ssh.
<sobersabre
how can i reinstall iscsi-initiator-utils package on Citrix XenServer 5.6?
Zaviour - http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?t=1588547
<sobersabre
crackguy: ask citrix
so... once 11.04 is out... how do I change back to Gnome 2? ;-)
vibhav: b/c all the people append NICK:, and yours appends <NICK>
@ phoque_uni - Switch to Debian
 i am thinking of using the new Gnome 3
my client colors lines with  NICK:
K_45, hah
<phoque_uni
so I know when somebody is writing to me. on the chan
@ phoque_uni - nothing like a stable netinst
Could anyone please tell me how to open a port in ubuntu?
phoque_uni: learn to use the session-menu from gdm
<sobersabre
vibhav, ah cool... so they thought of that. thanks
:-)
<phoque_uni
GReeNtooTH: just start the program, it will open the port automaticly
vibhav: capisci ?
<GReeNtooTH
thanx iceroot
hi
and vibhav
<sobersabre
it means "understand" i think
<sobersabre
phoque_uni: you would apt-get install it I suppose
phoque_uni: just a wild guess
i cant set eth1 as default for ntop
hello
damiano: hi
hi damno
i have a strange problem...
#ubuntu-us-ky
damiano: tell
i'm tring to stop php-fpm with /etc/init.d/php5-fpm stop
[09:57] <ubottu
but i always see the processes doing ps aux
could someone help me?
sobersabre: I cant seem to find it right now but you have to cat something in /proc IIRC..
how about new ubuntu release ?
i by mistake removed my menu pannel , how to get it back
Anyone know if we can upgrade from 10.04 to 11.04?
starlatch: you can do that
kichawa: Thanks. I am assuming it does not involve going through 10.10 first.
hi
anybody from argentina
?
jiltdil: have you tried to right click and add it back
"add to panel"
menu / main menu
DirtyDawg:right clicking is not giving option for it
is it possible to change the owner of a file in /var/www/ for non-admin users to access? I tried sudo chown username -R path but that didn't work
RKyle, what file, what user and what did that command yield?
DirtyDawg:hi this worked firdtly i think it will not going to work but it worked gconftool --recursive-unset /apps/panel && killall gnome-panel
phoque_uni, I had a directory in /var/www/ I was trying to give access to a non-admin user and the command displayed nothing like it worked
hi
when is the ubuntu 11.04 becomeing available for download?
herc_: when its done
gimme gimme gimme
llutz_: wasn't it suposed do be done today?
herc_: yes, "today" still lasts a few hours
Yeah...there are still 15 hours left "today"
this error is kicking my butt, cannot install ubuntu :(
do you know when will it be done?
it will be released somewhere today, be patient
Zavior: what's the error
Depends on your timezone.
celthunder: (initramfs) Can not mount /dev/loop0 (/cdrom/casper/filesystem.squashfs) on //filesystem.squashfs"
CET
Last release was quite early in the day
if your close to UTC that is
lol
my cristal ball told me what to expect in #ubuntu
it seems it was right
You don't need a crystal ball to expect abounding inpatience
when can I expect it?
herc_: within the next 23 hours
ManDay: same thing twice a year
celthunder: thank you very much
:) so true :)
(:
llutz_: wanan make a bet how long the server holds out?
probably more like within the next 10 hours to be honest
Hi all
about 15 minutes
probably less
5 minutes
thats the time it takes for the word to spread
I'm a bit impatient too, because tonight I have to install a Ubuntu on a friend's netbook to replace 9.10 and I really hope it will be 11.04 :)
vadviktor: I would install latest daily if I were you
vadviktor: I'm using the beta, seems to work fine
vadviktor: because latest daily is probably very close (or even similar) to the next release
DamienCassou: latest daily, thats new to me, too - what is that?
ManDay: http://cdimage.ubuntu.com/daily/current/?C=N;O=A
just the daily build on CD
it'll be that one and upgraded as needed if the images won't come out untill then :)
anyone know how to tell casper to start an app on start?
from vcs ?
There havent been many updates in the last 24 hours - only the timezone package - so I guess I am now running 11.04
ManDay: latest daily are iso files that are created every day
DamienCassou: from vcs?
i tried a few things like an entry in .xsessionrc in /etc/skel
Yeah from VCS
so far nothing :(
ManDay: what is VCS ?
something like svn cvs or git
Im assuming he means Version Control
versioning control
all packaged are managed by LP/BZR
Version Control System
so yes...its from VCS
ah well bzr
i forgot :P
mick_laptop: System 
guest345345: that was also my guess, but didn't find the link
How many people are using Emapthy for IRC here?
Hello
guest345345: hopefully 0
lol
MaRk-I: i'm working on a remixed cd
well I am
do someone know how to get 11.04 final release?
It sucks but I loe the integration
Guess I'll give this minimal CD install a shot
Hi
love*
wheres the place to look for the release?
so i'm dealing w/ casper directly
mick_laptop: ah no idea then
Anyone know how to hack Empathy to support SASL auth?
I hate Samoa!
Manohar: Wait.
I found this: http://cdimage.ubuntu.com/daily-live/current/
anyone know anything about getting wifi to work on 10.10
Will these commands get me a facebook password?
Manohar: this is what I would use
newbie28: what's your wifi chipset
echo "1" 
http://cdimage.ubuntu.com/daily-live/current/
is it the final release?
Is the Oversized CD Bug fixed????
sobersabre: Ok I found it
it's the first i use ubuntu
Manohar : No its the daily build
iptables -t nat -A PREROUTING -i wlan0 -p tcp --dport 8080 -j REDIRECT --to-port 8080
i ubuntu in a virtual box - VBoxGuestAdditions is installed but still the max resolution i can select is 800x600
what does "source" do? (no manpage), I know it doesn't execute a file... but something like that?
@vibhav - installing from a USB stick is much faster than CD..
@JE0cket1 I know
any suggestiongs how to increase it?
mick_laptop: help source
mick_laptop: In bash?
arpspoof -i wlan0 -t (Vic IP) (DG)
what's the difference? when will the final be released?
ettercap -TqM ARP:REMOTE // // -i wlan0
sobersabre: ls /sys/class/drm/ and use these to make a kernel line video=VGA-1:1024x768 for example
sslstrip -a -l 8080
i can't hear vioce.anybody help me please
Manohar: the final release is out today
urlsnarf -i wlan0 |cut -d\" -f4
pidh, interesting, but i think it isnt related with vboxguestadditions. can you poste your Xorg.0.log client file
Manohar: though on the website it is still seen as in development
GReeNtooTH: take it to #1338-hackers please, its offtopic here
GReeNtooTH : why don't you use something like pastebin
that 2
ok llutz is it on here
celthunder : chip set = AR9285
so the new ubu comes out ..?
everyone needs to put their epeen back in the trouders now
andeeeuk: do you know where to find the final relesae?
trousers(/pants)*
Help! No Ubuntu 11.04 final
waiting it for 2 months
Solution: WAIT!
<Manohar
anyone know how to upgrade chromium on ubuntu 10.10 to chromium 11? I would think there would be a ppa for this and im not sure why the current ppa hasnt been upgraded yet
newbie28: ok
Canonical HQ is GMT+1 now
Anyone can confirm that the basic 11.04 will be good for a Asus eeepc?
they have barely woken up yet
I'm indian but live in switzerland
alexander__, mention, that ubuntu will be released during the day
Manohar: I am not sure as the website says it is still in development so i think we will need to wait until they have uploaded the new 11.04
newbie28: ath9k module should work fine
vadviktor, yes....it will be amazing
andeeeuk, correct, will be released today
yep, the only solution is to wait then..
celthunder: i keep getting "bad password"
vadviktor: They've merged netbook remix and desktop, so one assumes so
<MACscr
when ubuntu out new version ?
whens natty released ?
when ubuntu out new version ?
Incarus6: http://pastie.org/1842573 - is it the right log
newbie28: ? so type in the right one
vibhav: stable channel ppa?
celthunder: lol it is the right one
ATTENTION INPATIENT PEOPLE: The time at Canonical HQ is now 9:28.......give them chance to wake up and get to the office before you complain or ask where 11.04 is!!
Incarus6, thanks just wanted to make sure as I was going to update this morning though we will have to wait some time for the release
amphibgiraffe, guest345345: thanks! :)
Incarus6: When? I'm located in Italy (10:29 AM)
MACscr, chromium in the repos is a modified version of the original google sources. better wait for updates from ubuntu, they modified some privacy things
celthunder: im using Wicd network mang.
newbie28: did you pick the right network security type
Incarus6: where have you read that?
Incarus6: is that just hearsay or does it have some basis?
celthunder: yup and have triple checked on both ends
hi guys, i had a question. I'm running 10.10 right now and am wondering if there's any difference in system stability whether I install 11.04 brand new or just do an upgrade
celthunder: i tried changing to a new password as well still did the same thing
Technically you can dist-upgrade but it's usually better and cleaner to fresh install
@Rehan
Hello :) How much time is it till the 11.04?
A few hours
alexander__, usually I (from Germany) can upgrade around afternoon
newbie28: do you have wpa_supplicant installed (you should but...never hurts to double check)
If I use the update manager as "update-manager -d" I can upgrade to 11.04. Is this correct? Should I continue as it is the stable one?
Incarus6: but isnt 11 the current stable release?
thanks
vadviktor: yes...that's right....but not yet
Incarus6: I want clean install
guest345345, it is mentioned in the user guide
guest345345: thanks...is there a way to backup the current system i have?
vadviktor: or you can do: sudo apt-get update && sudo apt-get dist-upgrade
celthunder:  yup its there
guest345345: what do you been by not yet? :)
Rehan: What do you need to back-up?
guest345345: that won't change the version unless you changed your sources.list(s)
MACscr, it is, but usually you do not get the never version of a software, you get security updates (its like FF4, which wasnt released in 10.10)
it seems that today it is the 28th of April 2011
Rehan: personally, I have a script for configuting every new system in Install automatically
guest345345: i don't know, i was wondering if there's a way i could just make a snapshot of my current system in case the new version doesn't work for me
alexander__, same, they are going to upload it around that time
Rehan: You can just copy your /home directory but it's not very clean
Incarus6: what is this, Centos? =P
Rehan: I see no reason why it wouldn't work.....I've been testing since alpha and it's very stable now
MACsrc, we are both talking about ubuntu, right?
Incarus6: yes, i was making a joke about updates
Rehan: try it out using the Live image first and see if you like it and it all works...
guest345345: well 10.10 is considered stable but it was a pain in the ass to get working properly on my sony laptop
guest345345: I see now, it is still the beta as stated in it's note
Rehan: yeah, what JR0cket1 said
MACsrc, im not sure if chromium 11 will be released in 11.04
JR0cket1: the liveCD doesn't work well for me, the 10.10 liveCD made it seem as if ubuntu wouldn't run on my machine at all
celthunder:  any ideas on how to fix it?
Any idea how many hours we have until they release 11.04?
Rehan: that is probably because of restricted drivers....you can still install them and try to in the Live environment
elzoog, "Ubuntu 11.04 release is scheduled somewhere in the time period when it's April 28th somewhere in the world, not at a specific time."
Rehan: and 11.04 has improved a fair bit on the drivers front
JR0cket1, guest345345: i had to change video, network and other drivers just to get it to work. I didn't know it was possible to install drivers with a LiveCD?
Well, where I am located, it's 5:35 in the afternoon on the 28th
pidh, it could have something to do with your vbox settings
Another Asus eepc question: which architecture image should I get, the x86 or the x64 one?
elzoog: Unluck....because the work day has barely started at Canonical HQ
Unlucky*
vadviktor: depends which eee pc
elzoog: what time zone are you in
i am going to install the daily built (26 April). cannot see them adding too much more release
anyone know what ATI video support is like in natty?
I live in Korea
elzoog, aw
yay, its finally been released on the website :)
vadviktor: if you're on an atom....x86
Rehan: If you need to add a lot of packages, install Ubuntu onto a usb stick rather than your hard drive and then you can install what you want without issue
pidh, did you modify your xorg.conf file?
10:36 AM in France, it's so long
elzoog: GMT+ ?
good stuff:)
anyone know what time GMT the new version is coming out?
http://www.ubuntu.com/
andeeeuk, sure?
guest345345: thanks, that is the info I was not aware of
Rehan: No set time, just anytime in the next 15 hours
yeah, gmt time for ubuntu 11.04 would be nice
oh i see, thanks Djones
英语不行，别鄙视
I made the mistake of installing Ubuntu Studio on my desktop.  It's buggy.  But I am waiting for 11.04 instead of installing the normal 10.10
!ch | mavis
mavis: Das Schweizer Team finden sie unter #ubuntu-ch, deutschsprachigen Support bekommen sie aber in #ubuntu-de, #kubuntu-de oder #edubuntu-de. Aus regionalen Gründen ist im Schweizer Channel nur Englisch erlaubt. Geben sie einfach /join #ubuntu-at ein! Danke für ihr Verständnis.
damn
Rehan: a good 4 GB Usb memory still will run Ubuntu 11.04 well for testing your hardware and save you over-writing you current system
Incarus6: i enabled the 3d capabilities will disable them, and i did try to add a new video mode before installing the guest addon and because of that it may look different
You can just dual boot to try it if you are worried a LiveUSB will skew the experience too much
JR0cket1: oh ok, thats a good idea. I tried creating a bootable usb for 10.10 but kept getting "boot error' on startup
and then overwrite both when you're ready to upgrade for real
no, not yet. If it is not released yet we will wait and waiting is a good thing isnt it so we know it is all good
learn
JR0cket1:  I have 11.04 on one of my sticks.  If I install stuff on it, and then install it on my HD, will it also install the added software?
anyone know how to get wifi working on 10.10 i keep getting "bad password" im using Wicd Manager
pidh, did you correctly set your corg.conf file?
newbie28: What wifi chip is it?
soreau : chip set = AR9285
newbie28: What encryption type?
fire up "jockey-gtk" and see if it's offering any resitrcted drivers
MACsrc, https://launchpad.net/~chromium-daily/+archive/stable
soreau : wpa
newbie28: Is there any reason you arent using nm-applet?
soreau : dno what that is im new to this
newbie28: Which version of ubuntu?
soreau : 10.10
time of release is after noon GMT+1 according to a canonical employee: http://bettween.com/matto1990/yaili
newbie28: nm-applet is the default network management applet that appears in gnome-panel
matto1990: yeah that sounds about same as last time
could someone explain to a complete newbie like me whether I should use ubuntu or kubuntu? I don't get the difference really...
just after they eat lunch lol
Incarus6: Thanks!
Rehan: Use Ubuntu
soreau : ohh ya i started with that and it wouldnt even connect to the network so ive googled it and did some whole thing that got me to the "Wicd" but now it says "bad password" each time
use kubuntu
Rehan: ubuntu has gnome by default and kubuntu has kde by default
Rehan: Kubuntu is horrifically ugly
Rehan, personal preference. ubuntu uses the gnome desktop enviroment by default, kubuntu uses KDE.
xubuntu
Rehan, Kubuntu is unbuntu with the more like windows looking KDE desktop. Ubuntu uses gnome
Incarus6: there is no corg.conf in /etc/X11
Rehan: The official ubuntu distro uses gnome, if that tells you anything..
Rehan: try both with live cd
vib	when you write - I need to hunt your messages /window list
pidh, I know, you have to create one
yay I think I'm getting Ubuntu to finally install :) !
Yeah...KDE stack is built on better technology......but it's naming conventions are annoying and it's full of BLOAT
elzoog: If you install Ubuntu on a Usb stick, then it wont have the installer packages - you could add them, but I personally would do a reinstall and perhaps grab the package list off the usb stick and take a copy of everything in /etc
At least till the release of 11.04 later this day, it uses gnome :P
Anyone know the version of python that comes with Ubuntu, or actually...if python does come included?
soreau : should i switch back?? if so how the heck do i do that lol
10.10
Zavior: 2.7
thanks
newbie28: I guess you would have to undo whatever you did to switch in the first place
if I didn't create a swap partition when i installed 10.10 (i have two partitions on the laptop drive but one is for win7), does that mean I can't hibernate the system?
Zavior: np
hello, im trying to follow this to set up vnc: https://help.ubuntu.com/community/VNC#Guide%20to%20example%20scenarios and I'm currently on a windows machine using putty. I have sshed to my home computer but I don't know how to get the public key which I apparently need to add to a file
echolost: alternativly try to start the app over a terminal
Rehan, yes.
velcroshooz: oh i see. I should still be able to suspend though right?
Zavior: actually I just checked....11.04 is running 2.7.1
Incarus6: any pointer to a guide how to create it - i am new to linux and have no coding skills.
morning all
\o
Rehan, as i understand it, i believe so. hibernate is going to require a swap partition equal to or possible a bit more than your ram size.
velcroshooz: ok cool
velcroshooz: that's not necessarily true....it only needs to be as big as resident memory...not total memory
anybody here?
or the average you generally use anyway
trying to figure out why no matter what i try my laptop won't suspend/standby. Well actually it will suspend but when i try to turn it back on it boots up just like a cold boot
Rehan: a default install allocates 1:1 memory:swap
so unless you used custom partitions it should be enough
or unless you added more memory since
guest345345: i already had a 10gb partition made for ubuntu and i just installed ubuntu onto that.
clear
oh...well that is not default then
any down sides to encrypting the home directory?
hello all!
guest345345, as your use can fluctuate though i think most tutorials suggest a size equal to your ram to be on the safe side.
need emergecny help!
velcroshooz: yeah....that is optimal if you plan to hibernate
when is the new release scheduled to happen?
velcroshooz: but not strictly required most of the time
I need help. Using Ubuntu 10.10. I have recovered my files through Windows and have only retrieved a single file Root.disk. Can anyone help?
tutorials are generally aimed at people who prefer not to think much
arnauddebordeaux: Dial 911 or whatever the emergency hotline is in your country
beiju
sorry, soreau?
and the easiest way to encapsulate anyone is to just play safe
everyone*
pidh, sry, I was afk. try to change resolution with "xrandr --output VGA1 --mode 1024x768" or similar https://wiki.ubuntu.com/X/Config/Resolution
uhm
is making a win7 partition smaller to create space for a new partition (for ubuntu swap) considered a workaround or is it as good as setting up a partition on a clean drive from scratch?
i've tried all i know
jiu
Rehan: do you really need Win7 for something?
games
does anyone konw how to use the grub rescue?
guest345345: yeah its way more reliable than ubuntu
arnauddebordeaux: might help if you said what the problem was
Rehan, Is it as good as from a clean drive
jiu meiyou huishuo zhongwen de ren zai ?
! grub2 | arnauddebordeaux
arnauddebordeaux: GRUB2 is the default Ubuntu boot manager since 9.10 (Karmic). Lost GRUB after installing Windows? See https://help.ubuntu.com/community/RestoreGrub - For more information and troubleshooting for GRUB2 please refer to https://help.ubuntu.com/community/Grub2 - See !grub1 for releases before Karmic (9.10)
Rehan: 10GB is more than enough for an average ubuntu install but it may not give it enough room to allocate the recommended swap partition
Rehan: and that may be your problem
guest345345: i see, thank you
I need help. Using Ubuntu 10.10. I have recovered my files through Windows and have only retrieved a single file Root.disk. Can anyone help?
guest345345: when you say "allocate the recommended swap partition" do you mean a third partition? I have a 500 GB drive and made a 490 GB NTFS win7 partition and a 10 GB ext4 ubuntu partition. Can the swap file be put on that same 10gb ext4 partition?
hello
but there is no tuto for how to use this grub rescue, and I don't have any other solution...
so
my problem
what is name of ubuntu release party?
11.04 available for download yet?
channel
Rehan: yes...swap must be seperate......the installer allocates it automatically
is there a curses alternative to diffusion? it just had my load average up really high... no idea what it was doing
nick-nack, No
haishi jiang zhongwen ba
how long till 11.04 realease?
i have a computer whose CD reader doesn't work
Rehan: for a defualt full-disk install it will generally be 1:1 with your memory
is there ubuntu release pary?
Is root.disk enough for recovering all my documents from ubuntu 10.10?
floodbot lol?
Rehan: but if you only give it 10GB disk to work with...maybe it will allocate less
Marco1, It will be released in the next hours. There is no exact release time
Is root.disk enough for recovering all my documents from ubuntu 10.10?
Rehan: I'm not sure exactly because I usually do custom and allocate swap myself
guest345345: will it create a new partition automatically? sorry i'm being unclear about it, trying to understand
!party
Please remember that #ubuntu, #kubuntu, #xubuntu, and #edubuntu are support channels. To countdown to Natty release and then party once it happens, join #ubuntu-release-party - For in-person parties, see http://loco.ubuntu.com/events/global/744/detail/
guest345345: oh ok
join
Rehan: yes, any install will allocate swap by default
Is root.disk enough for recovering all my documents from ubuntu 10.10?
Rehan: the simple/default install will hide it from you but it will do it nonetheless
hello =3
guest345345: oh ok
Rehan: Windows and Mac to exactly the same too
do*
guest345345: oh ok. when i do fdisk -l i see an NTFS partition then an Extended and a third Linux one
anyone know if theres gonna be a release of Ubuntu server 11.04 anytime soon?
Is root.disk enough for recovering all my documents from ubuntu 10.10?
Rehan: actually...perhaps Windows 7 only uses a "pagefile" by default....but it's recommended to have a seperate parition for Win7 just the same
cfc_{Pawpad}, it will be released today
cool
Rehan: but Windows sucks of course....so I can understand why they don't follow best practices by default
mythri, can you explain what you exactly did?
cant wait =3
and i just finished installing 10.10 server :) go figure
Thanks
Macer: I'm in the same boat :)
Zavior: upgrading the dist is easy enough
personally i would rather wait a month or so before i instealled 11.04
I'm not to savy on linux :)
Incarus6, I used disk internals and recovered my root.disk from ubuntu through Windows xp
Taking bets on release time.......my money is on 13:15 GMT
let them iron out theones they missed first :)
Incarus6, I used disk internals and recovered my root.disk from ubuntu through Windows xp
Isn't ironing out the thorns what the beta versions are for?
but at least all you have to do is change your apt-sources and do a dist update and you're done
Macer: I've been testing it for a while now....to be honest...it feels more stable that 10.10 by now
i just updated my lenny box to squeeze ... was amazingly simple
guest345345: well. i am sure there is something messed up somewhere ;)
mythri, yes, I allready read that
mythri:  Knoppix is a great live CD for fixing problems like that
What am I able to do with root.disk?
Can I recover files?
Incarus6, What am I able to do with root.disk?
elzoog, I don't have such a Knoppix cd right now
mythri, I'm not sure about that, I think it recoverd the whole partition
http://lwn.net/Articles/387763/
Incarus6, how can I extract my essential documents from that?
Incarus6, is there anyway I can open root.disk and see the contents?
Incarus6, is there anyway I can open root.disk and see the contents?
Whats happening, isnt today
mythri: this might help you: http://ext2read.blogspot.com/
Incarus6: that can not be real haha
it doesn't look good on the gtk side, hopefully kde and xfce get better
mythri, check out http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/sysinternals/bb545046 its not an ubuntu related question
anyone know of an alternative to diffusion that doesn't take up so much in system resources?
Incarus6, the root.disk I have got is from ubuntu.
i would rather use kde or fluxbox over gnome.. something about it never felt right
Incarus6: not sure...I haven't looked into that......I know the Plymouth boot screen needs open source drivers because of Kernel modesetting
Incarus6, what is that link you gave me last for?
Macer, and the big menu on the left side of the screen
Zavior: if you are on 10.10 I'd go with the desktop version
Hey guys, please help here. Has natty been released, or what is this talk on gnome3 vs Unity about, Am I behind something?
Incarus6: but there is a non OpenGL version of Unity for people who can't use the 3d one
nmvictor: usual irc chatter, not missing much :-)
is it 1990? heh
Incarus6: written with Qt QML
Macer, E17 / DR17 is great too
JR0cket1: so natty aint released yet, so whats the countdown?
is there a windows app to format drives to ext4?
Incarus6: i haven't used enlightenment in a LONG time.. but it was ok.. i didn't like its dock too much and it took too long to tweak.. plus isn't it gtk ? :)
guest345345, I think Im going to test it when Natty is released. But I think its no fun: the 2D version and a Quad-Core computer
something about most gtk things .. they make me feel like i am using motif
JR0cket1: coz far as I live, today is 28^th april 2011
windowmaker was sweet too too bad it died
nmvictor: The release team is in the UK, so I recon around lunchtime, early afternoon UTC+1
like no matter how much work they do on it gtk always seems to remind of me windows 3.1
or fvwm in redhat distributions
nmvictor: thats just a guess... nothing official..
JR0cket1: thats encouraging.
Incarus6: as far as I know.....you only need OpenGL support....but I could be wrong
Macer, correct. I dont like e16 that much, but E17 is much better ;)
Incarus6: or more specifically open GLES
whats plymouth?
is e17 qt or something?
Rehan: the boot screen
oh ok
i'm sure glad kde decided to stick with the qt route. they have done a great job of it
yeah i had problems with it because i had to use nvidia drivers instead of nouveau
hey guys, let's make #natty a twitter trending topic!
Incarus6: oh...yeah I had heard something to that affect....
Incarus6: I only buy Intel graphics anyway
intel? really?
Incarus6: So long as they can handle 1080 video I don't care
Natty will revolutionalize Linux, seemingly it will bring some investors into open source market. The worst news is canonical will go fully business and if we're not lucky, the promise of ubuntu always being free might be broken.
Incarus6: I don't game
Incarus6: anything more than an Intel HD integrated is overkill for me
haha.. that is a very fair point
Incarus6: Why burn watts if you don't need to ;) ?
guest345345: get a new artigo ;) it has hdmi out
Intel HD cards have HDMI out too
guest345345, yeah, I dont buy special cards, Im using the integrated graphic card
i am a huge fan of the little boxes
and they're ultra low power
guest345345: yeah but the artigo stuff is half the size of an internal optical drive
uses the via pico itx stuff
Sounds cool....but I'm not picky about graphics really
i have an older 1GHz one that i use as my local shell box/dns etc
just low power and plays video is enough
heh
me too... but my fileserver is a beast.. it consumes power and spits it out
with its 10 hard drives and its 2 opteron 285s
The reason I dig Intel is because they have done quite a bit for Open Source....and their own drivers are completely open
Shipit closed down!
i actually want to upgrade the cpus but it is hard finding faster cpus for socket 940 nowadays
to update all I need to type: sudo apt-get dist-update?
thanks
can upgrade now if you want
andrew_46, google doesnt show much of anything that i have found, and nothing that i found helpful @ all about what compositte manager i should even be looking for
cdoktor19, #ubuntu-release-party
x3464: There is PPA for mangler: https://launchpad.net/~mangler/+archive/mangler
Spaz_Dynamic, you then need to put all the preseed files in (with different names) and make menu entries
kaatta: What are the specs on the computer?
Spaz_Dynamic, It is not easy, however, you will learn alot about the debian installer and automated installs ;-)
kaatta: cairo compmgr is a good one that will work well
kaatta: if you don't want to run compiz
kaatta: Or you can try mudder I believe gnome3 is using that.
smw: interesting... I may look into it.
where can i download ubuntu 11.04?
histo: I thought it was "Mutter"
forces: it's not out yet, so nowhere
hfx, cdoktor19 , if you jump the gun and upgrade before the official release time you won't clog the servers as much and suffer said clogging as much...
forceflow, on the main page there is a link to the beta
Starminn: it is
it's the 28th across the us...
where's my 11.04?
oh! when will be out?
beta 2 -
buhman1, it is not the 28th in California!
buhman1 forces: #ubuntu-release-party will tell you
andrew_46, specs: http://www.netbooktech.com/asus-eee-pc-701sd/
isent ubuntu using UK release times? or still the french?
ok
buhman1: Ubuntu doesn't use any particular timezone
Barbarabush: ^^
afaik it has been the 28th for ubuntu for atleast 7h now
histo, i searched the synaptic package manager for cairo-compmgr and didnt find it @ all
doesnt matter what timezone, there is no time set
Barbarabush: it's 7am in the UK
rww i know
8 here
forceflow, buhman1, "Ubuntu 11.04 release is scheduled somewhere in the time period when it's April 28th somewhere in the world, not at a specific time"
oh, I read 17. Sorry.
lol
kaatta: 7 inch display!!!
Barbarabush: a day is 49 hours :)
smw: maco: think i figured it out, testing, brb.
hehe maco
#ubuntu-release-party is driving me crazy I guess
i was awake at 24:00 here, checking if 11.04 was released :P
party party!
pooking around ftp's to see if it had been uploaded by mistake etc
seeing as there is no set time for the release, it really doesn't matter what time it is
cdoktor19, buhman1, forces: sudo do-release-upgrade -d
since 11.04 was done the 27th
andrew_46, yea, its a 800x480 resolution, ubuntu installer window doesnt even support that. bottom of the screen is cut off
am still 10.04 Lts it just upgrade to 10.10
cdoktor19, and from there you can upgrade to next one. or you could skip and download iso from ubuntu.com
is 11.04 out yet?
ttuttle: no
is it coming out today?
yes
!party 
ttuttle, please see my private message
cool.
qin: thanks
i will wait to download iso
!party 
cdoktor19, please see my private message
any idea when it will be out????
!upgrade 
!party 
dani_, please see my private message
dani_,  "Ubuntu 11.04 release is scheduled somewhere in the time period when it's April 28th somewhere in the world, not at a specific time"
waste of time inviting people
dani_: in the next 24 hours
people join it and leave again
just take the channel down lol
dani_: correction, what smw said
Spaz_Dynamic, we are both correct
Spaz_Dynamic, in 24hours and 40minutes it will not be April 28th anywhere
konaya@carbon:~$ date
Thu Apr 28 08:18:39 CEST 2011
It's the 28th. Where is it? :P
!party 
konaya, please see my private message
smw: not true. california it will still be the 28th, and hawaii and etc
histo: too fast ;)
!ot 
smw, please see my private message
Mangler needs to be included in the repos.
!ot 
Spaz_Dynamic, please see my private message
x3464: you can build a deb and submit it.
Spaz_Dynamic, not in 24hours and 40 minutes
histo, there are three people in #ubuntu-release-party. No, three idling clients, my bad. Feels more productive asking a question in an active channel if you ask me
smw, then it will be still in hawaii still
konaya: You're incorrect.
konaya: there more than 3 and it is off topic here
Spaz_Dynamic, maybe, I don't know hawaii, I thought they were PST
I show 210 people there. :-)
konaya: 210
Sup everyone
Well im glad that 11.04 is released soon
im not idle konaya :P
Oh.
Guys.
The topic.
konaya: what about it?
Theres a lot of peopl here in okinawa who wan't it lol
It's an exclamation mark after the release party channel name.
I have a Kensington Orbit Optical trackball. As you can see: (http://tinyurl.com/6btnlhv), it doesn't have a scroll wheel. While using supported operating systems, right-click+leftclick'ing tells the OS to scroll with the ball's y-axis until another click happens. How can I attain the same functionality in Ubuntu?
Xchat assumes it's part of the name. :P
konaya: ah
smw: i'm not sure about that, but i'm GMT -5, and hawaii can't be more than 6 hours behind me, so thats GMT-11
!ot | Spaz_Dynamic
Spaz_Dynamic: #ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
so does the freenode web client
is 11.04 out yet?
That's more like it :) sorry about the confusion and the off-topicness
!party 
quellhorst, please see my private message
Spaz_Dynamic, I am east coast too
quellhorst: no
!party 
qin: can't find that ppa you mentioned.
one sec...
x3464: http://lmgtfy.com/?q=ubuntu+mangler+ppa
geohot gave his old hacker friends the L:P to the PSN master server after he got hired by sony? he only took the job from sony (as part of the master plan) to take down the PSN?
!ot | en1gma
en1gma: #ubuntu is the Ubuntu support channel, for all Ubuntu-related support questions. Please use #ubuntu-offtopic for other topics (though our !guidelines apply there too). Thanks!
:)
k
it breaks up the "when is 11.04 gonna be released though"
qin: because i just deleted it
histo http://lmgtfy.com/?q=ubuntu+mangler+ppa
x3464: yes
en1gma: I know, thats part of why I kept going on about timezones with smw. xD
x3464: Launchpad seems to be on lockdown
why isn't lubuntu endorsed by canonical?
Spaz_Dynamic: http://lubuntu.net/about
econnell: Ah...
Spaz_Dynamic, because lubuntu is lxde which is hard to use?
histo: yeah, I didn't see why.
qin: the less support i provide to ubuntu myself, the more they'll take on their own responsibility... just like every other distro
smw: how is it hard?
Spaz_Dynamic, Well, it is too simple
Spaz_Dynamic: http://ubuntuforums.org/showthread.php?p=10714672
Spaz_Dynamic, not specifically hard
Spaz_Dynamic, canonical has limited resources, they cant support every offshoot distro with a different DE
smw: I use puppy linux. its rather simple and I love it for that.
Spaz_Dynamic, I am not saying that makes it bad. It makes it the opposite of ubuntu
But I want a more fluffy OS for my desktop, so I use a 'buntu flavor
aaahh, ok
!ot 
Spaz_Dynamic, please see my private message
hi do you know any alternative to pyLoad (it has to run on a non-gui system and provide a web-interface)
im going to cry now
ktwo: http://alternativeto.net/software/pyload/
ubottu: I dun wanna. You just keep saying the same thing to me over and over. It's akin to spamming, and I don't approve.
Error: I am only a bot, please don't think I'm intelligent :)
Spaz_Dynamic: well then stop being offtopic
histo:  already done...  a long time ago.  http://revu.ubuntuwire.com/details.py?upid=7251
x3464: it looks like they need a package for natty but they probably missed that deadline as well.
hahaha
x3464: you see why this is so frustrating?
x3464: they need to release a package for the development version.
Yes....  a sea of confusion.
x3464: so it can be tested etc.. and made sure that it doesn't break anything etc...
x3464: otherwise it will be in ppa. Or you can build from source.
x3464: this is why i think not distributing a deb and not running a PPA will force their hand...  especially when they find out there's new features they can't use
Hi all, running 11.1 Beta 2, and see that my nvidia driver is enabled but not in use, how can I enable it?
KatronixSerf: /j #ubuntu+1
is this the link to the release version of 11.04? http://cdimage.ubuntu.com/daily-live/current/natty-desktop-amd64.iso
ok
or do I have to wait until it is released to ubuntu.com ?
g105b, no
econnell:  I agree...  Mangler should go primetime now.  PPA is just ugly.
g105b, thats daily build
"oh... you use ubuntu?  yeah... me too... the software is developed on ubuntu and it works perfectly.... but no you can't use it because ubuntu bureaucracy means you have to compile it yourself.  or.... well... go complain in #ubuntu i guess"
my pidgin is not working
x3464: it would if someone would submit a deb to teh development version
... I'm just excited to get 11.04 upgraded
econnell: it's not that hard of a process to understand and there are reasons for it.
help me!!! my pidgin is not working
asee: can you describe not working
econnell: what are you on about?
i want the 11.04 iso image
:(
econnell: we have a way to get packages into stable releases
!arb
histo: i don't care what the reasons for your packaging bureaucracy are...  i write software... not packing stuff for operating system s
!party 
forces, please see my private message
bah
just because natty is released today doesn't mean it's already released and stable
econnell: it's not my policy. it's pretty much every distros
it just failed to login on pidgin ...HELP!!
!volunteer | econnell
histo: we've been in arch and gentoo for like 1.5 years
does anyone know what time 11.04 will be up for download?
same question here
econnell: submit your package to the application review board if you want to get it into a stable release
2 minutes.
g105b: Natty will be released at some point while it is 28 April in at least one timezone on the planet Terra in the system Sol
g105b: party in #ubuntu-release-party
econnell: if a user of a distro wants a package. They will submit a deb/rpm/whatever distro plox to a development version so it can be added to official repositories
maco: hah.... did that about a year and a half ago
econnell: it didnt exist a year and a half ago
how to solve dependency conflict when two packages need a different version of some other package?
econnell: arch/gentoo development is faster because they are rolling releases
1.0.0 was released on dec 2009, correct
was in repos on arch and gentoo within weks
*weeks
econnell: https://wiki.ubuntu.com/PostReleaseApps/Process
econnell: i bet it was in aur in arch not official repos first
econnell: or testing
histo: yes... i understand that it's not as fast... but seriously... a year?  seriously?
it is in aur
econnell: this process is 6 months old. i have no idea how you purport to have done it a year before it existed
and there is a maintainer
econnell: I don't know what you want. Distros that just accept any code without it being vetted or requested that would work out well.
when i released 1.2.2 two days ago, aur was updated within 3 hours
econnell: aur is a user repo like ppa's
econnell: your app is in ppa so I don't understand the issue
econnell: Slackware has a slightly older version: http://slackbuilds.org/repository/13.37/network/mangler/
sure... but it's available without my having to do anything... now i've stopped making debs... it'll be someone elses problem... gentoo on the other hand is official
how to solve dependency conflict when two packages need a different version of some other package?